

Shia was tapping Vire Doryukken on her shoulder while asking.



Toward that, Hajime's answer was…



"Hm? Of course, if there is a prey that enters the cage, then pulverizing it all together with the cage is common sense right? Everyone, prepare to jump."



" " "Eh?" " "



In front of Shizuku, Suzu, and Ryutaro who raised befuddled voice from being taken aback again, Hajime took out large type weapon from 'Treasure Warehouse II'. It had a huge cross shape, at one of its side there were three protruding objects that looked like a wing attached.



――New Rocket & Missile Launcher Agni Orkan



There were two of them. The figure of Hajime holding two three-meter crosses attached with wings in both arms had the impressiveness as though he was clad with a reinforced exoskeleton.



"Now then. First of all, it's troublesome so let's blow up all of these thoroughly."



Hajime who fixed himself in place with Agni-Orkan at both his sides was showing a demonic grin while pulling the triggers without hesitation. The inside of the surrounding buildings became noisy, but it was already too late.



*pshuu pshuu pshuu* With such sound the small metal plate on the surface of the wings slide, inside it, there were countless pencil missiles loaded up, those missiles flew out all at once.



Their number had already surpassed three hundred. The swarm of pencil missiles was trailing orange fire line while slipping smoothly through the door and window of the ruined buildings as though understanding that the enemies were there.



Furthermore, *bashuuuuu* with that kind of gentle sound, sixty large missiles were scattered from the six muzzles at the tip of the cross to the center of the ruined city, all within a few seconds, they scattered to all directions in order to trample their respective target.



Right after that, gruesome explosion sound and tremendous shockwave - flame explosion trampled the center of the ruined city.



*gogogo* Along with such roar, the group of ruined buildings who were only barely standing even in the best of times began to crumble all at once.



"Wai-, thi, this is bad. Everything, is falling toward here!"



"That's why, I told you to jump."



"Don't say that so calmly, you one man army!"



The silhouettes lurking in the ruined buildings who barely survived the fierce attack of the pencil missiles tried to jump out from the windows in order to escape the collapsing ruins even while they had lost some limbs. Hajime who courteously sent them back(blown them inside) with the additional bombing of Agni-Orkan that was completely merciless got a tsukkomi from Shizuku while she invoked the 'Air Force' in her boots and leaped to the air.



The fragments of crumbling buildings rained down from above like a heavy rain, Suzu and Ryutaro also jumped away in panic amidst the sky that was rapidly getting cramped due to the group of the tilting buildings.



And then, they somehow avoided being swallowed by the crumbling buildings and landed on the rooftop of a derelict building in slight distance away.



"…You see, Suzu once saw the news on television. It was the image of an air raid in a conflict area. Suzu wonder if that feel like this."



"Fighting is something fruitless huh. …No one will ever imagine of blowing up the whole city huh. This is already unrelated with technique or experience huuh."



"Both of you, don't get far-away look like that…I understand your feelings too."



Dust rose up grandly. Looking at the ruined city that was instantly turned into a scene like a conflict area made Suzu and Ryutaro have a far-away look. Shizuku patted their shoulder while thinking inside her heart "Just what is strength?". It was at that timing, *gacha* such sound that was like the symbol of ominous itself resounded.



Shizuku turned her face to that sound with creaking motion like a gear without oil, over there the figure of Hajime readying Agni-Orkan that he had finished reloading was…



" " "You are going to attack again!?" " "



"If you are going to do something then do it until not even a piece of meat remain. This is the culture of Japan that is even got placed on the Kojiki." (TN: Kojiki = Record of Ancient Matters (Japan's oldest historical record))



There is no such bloodthirsty culture! Suzu and others were going to make such tsukkomi, but the triggers were pulled faster than they could open their mouth. The swarm of large and small missiles danced on the sky once more. Rain of death was pouring down at the intersection where the wreckage of destroyed buildings was scattered.



"There is nothing to do isn't it?"



"Goshujin-sama too, he looked calm but it looks like his frustration hath piled up considerably. It can't be helped. How about we watch over him warmly until our turn comes up."



Amidst the flame explosion and the dust, Shia and Tio were sending gentle gaze at Hajime who was laughing loudly "HAA―HA-HA-HA" (TN: Imagine the laugh of Laharl from Disgaea) while continuously gifting lethal wounds at possibly hundreds of enemies lurking in the ruined city. Looking at those two, Shizuku who was plugging her ears with her fingers from the thunderous roar let out a sigh from the many difficulties in her future wondering if she really had to reach the level of the two.



"Why did I fall in love with this kind of person I wonder?" Just when she was thinking of something that was actually similar to what Shia once thought, suddenly Hajime turned back and aimed Agni-Orkan's muzzles at his allies.



And then, in front of the startled Shizuku and others, Hajime pulled the triggers with not even a speck of hesitation just as expected. Looking at the missile swarm that immediately flew out, Suzu went "Hii!" with a pathetic shriek.



But, naturally the missiles weren't aiming at the allies, the missiles drew irregular trajectory while evading Suzu and others beautifully and flew behind them.



And then, flame explosions were scattered one after another at abandoned building around five hundred meters away from them. It was truly an air strike.



Just what in the world is he attacking there? Suzu and others were thinking that while trickling with cold sweat from the attacking method that was bad for their heart. Right after that, pure white light pierced the sky from that ruined building.



"That's, don't tell me-"



"Na, Nagumo-! Stop it! Didn't you say that you gonna leave Kouki to us!"



Suzu and Ryutaro turned back at Hajime while yelling. Yes, the pillar of light rising to the sky was undoubtedly Kouki's magic power. Most likely Kouki released his magic power to defend against the sudden air strike. Hajime supposedly promised to leave Kouki and Eri to Shizuku and others, so the two of them directed flustered look at Hajime.



"That's why I attacked them. Those two looked like they were going to run away after all. I made the explosion to surround them without any direct hit so it's fine. In the end, it was just to hold them in place."



Hajime declared "hold them in place" while looking at the scene of high-rise buildings collapsing like a joke at the surrounding. He only looked like a guy screwing around saying "I hit them with the back of my blade" while directing the sharp blade at the enemy.



However, in actuality Kouki's magic power kept piercing the sky from inside the flame without any sign of weakening at all, so certainly Hajime didn't hit them directly. Even when they understood that, as expected the cramping of Suzu and Ryutaro's expression didn't stop.



"It appeared they were heading at that clock tower to escape. As expected, we can go to another space from there. I don't know why they are in this kind of place but…well, you guys can talk with them to your heart's content."



"Ye, yep."



"Ou…"



Suzu and Ryutaro nodded, at the same time, Hajime leaped toward the clock tower in one breath. Following after he were Shia and others. Their movement that applied 'Air Force' and 'Ground Shrinker' made the distance of five hundred meters into zero instantly.



Kouki and Eri who had no place to escape surrounded by shockwave and flame from four directions also didn't show any sign of moving from the rooftop of their ruined building, perhaps they had guessed they would be targeted with missile swarm once more if they tried to run.



Hajime and others landed on that ruined building.



"Aaaaa, we got discovered. Even though we expressly hid in one of Ehito's space collection, why did you all came here of all placeee. Even though this place is the farthest place from the Divine Gate spatiallyy"



"Eri. Either way, I have to liberate everyone from Nagumo. If the other side comes by themselves to us, then this is actually a godsend instead, right?"



Kouki and Eri clung tightly to each other like a pair of lovers while exchanging a talk that strangely didn't mesh with each other.



It appeared that from the bottom of her heart Eri didn't want to get involved with Hajime and others, but it seemed that Kouki's thinking that he had to rescue his comrades who he was convinced were brainwashed by Hajime didn't vanish, so Kouki's action was contradicting Eri who wanted to run away. Kouki's eyes also looked cloudy, so they guessed that he had been brainwashed by 'Bind Soul' to the degree that he couldn't feel the contradiction as a contradiction.



The gaze of Kouki who like always was equipped with a painfully bright holy sword and holy armor captured Hajime. Hatred, jealousy, rage――his gaze was muddy with such negative emotions boiling up.



And then, there was Eri who was rubbing her cheek on Kouki's shoulder while letting out a coaxing voice that sounded sticky sweet, it was unclear whether it was subconsciously or consciously, but her attitude looked exactly like how her mother once was. Her outfit was clothes that had the chest and back part largely opened, the bottom also had deep slit inserted, the color of the clothes was pure white that matched Kouki. As though she was implicitly asserting that the one who was Kouki's heroine was exactly her.



"Nagumo. You too are my classmate more or less. Originally you are someone that I have to save no matter what but…what you had done is too much. You killed your classmate, and you even brainwashed them…I, even if I have to dirty this hand, I will defeat you. And then, I swear I will save everyone from your filthy hand!"



"Yaaahnn. Kouki-kun, you are so coool~"



Kouki sent a smile at Eri who was clinging to him with intoxicated expression before readying his holy sword.



"…Hajime. Please go. Leave this place to us."



"Is it fine? Those guys had become something strange you know?"



Shizuku severely gripped her black katana so hard that it felt like creaking sound could be heard while she was urging Hajime to go ahead. Hajime was scrutinizing the two with the magic eye behind his eye patch while confirming at Shizuku. What he referred at wasn't about Kouki's behavior, he was pointing at the overflowing strength from Kouki that was incomparable with everything until now.



"I know that. But, it will be fine. Your artifact is together with me. Besides, you have the objective to rescue Yue correct? We are the one who should do something about this absolute moron somehow."



"….Well, I guess."



Hajime agreed with Shizuku with a shrug, he gave a glance at Kouki who was sending him intense gaze with eyes lifted up in wonder hearing the way Shizuku called Hajime's name and their talk that was filled with trust. And then Hajime urged Shia and Tio to go ahead with his gaze.



Kouki that guessed that Hajime and others were going to advance by ignoring him released killing intent so thick that was unthinkable coming from the Kouki before. His magic power also further roared and burst up.



"You want to escape-! You coward-! As I thought, I will defeat the filthy yo――"



The moment when he lifted his holy sword to let fly a slash, Kouki was blown away by an impact. Eri who was clinging to him was also forcefully separated from Kouki by an explosion of a really small barrier that was deployed near her unnoticed.



At the place where Kouki was standing before, there was the figure of Ryutaro with his fist outstretched unmoving.



"Kuh, Ryutaro. As I thought, you too are brainwashed by Nagumo…"



"What are you saying? Rather it's me who is trying to help you right now yeah? Doing something like sending killing intent at Nagumo…no way I can let my best friend get turned into minced meat like that."



"What are you saying…"



"So you ain't getting it huh, the you right now. You got really messed up at the head there. That's why I'm telling you, this awesome best friend is gonna beat you up black and blue until you wake UUUUP!"



Ryutaro howled. Kouki's state that looked really tragic fanned up his rage. That violent rage was directed at his best friend who didn't want to look at reality, and at his powerless self who couldn't do anything until his friend was turned into something like this.



That violent rage was poured into the fist that was tightly clenched like a rock, Ryutaro leaped toward Kouki.



"Aaaann, geez-. That's cruel to separate me from Kouki-kun. Is that something that a be-st-fri-end would do? Hey, Suzuu?"



"…Because Suzu feels that Suzu is your best friend, that right now, Suzu is here. Suzu won't let Nagumo-kun and others lay their hands on you, so it's fine to not be that scared you know, Eri?"



"…Hee, looks like you can talk big right now eeh"



Eri's expression quietly vanished due to Suzu's calm words and gaze. That was because Suzu's image as a naïve girl and a docile enemy of little importance in her mind was crumbling, Eri could feel a larger presence from her. And also because she who was fully wracking her brain inside her heart due to the unexpected encounter with Hajime was seen through by Suzu.



Suzu floated a smile on her lips from looking at Eri's change. She understood that she had finally become someone that Eri couldn't ignore.



"Nagumo-kun. Just as Shizushizu said, leave this place to Suzu and others, 'kay?"



Suzu said while drawing out the twin iron fans dangling on her waist and readied herself.



"…Don't get half-assed. After all, it will be troublesome if I've got to kill her myself later."



"Yep. Suzu gets it. Suzu will properly settle this, no matter what shape it ended in. Nagumo-kun and others too, be careful okay."



Hajime shrugged, then he directed his gaze at Shizuku. Shizuku too, she smiled slightly and nodded.



"See you later."



"Yeah. Later."



A light parting. Be that as it may, those words were filled with the resolve to reunite again without fail. Gazes of trust certainly crossed each other there.



This time Hajime turned back for sure. Without looking back, he rushed to the clock tower accompanied by Shia and Tio. "Wait-" Kouki's yell could be heard toward that back, but Ryutaro's war cry that immediately resounded after that and the thunderous roar that his fist played erased that voice, making it immediately inaudible.



And then, Hajime, Shia, and Tio followed the guidance of the compass and vanished into the rippling dial of the clock tower toward another space.



"Araraa, he really went away. Even though it would be better if you weren't obstinate and said 'help meeee' instead. Putting it bluntly, if that monster is not here then there is no problem at all you knooow?"



While laughing with a broad grin, Eri moved her gaze at Suzu and Shizuku who faced her.



"I wonder about that. Indeed, I am feeling an abnormal aura from the two of you right now. But, even we are by no means the same like before you know?"



"Ahahah, scary scary. I cannot let my guard down against Shizuku especially isn't iiit. Then, how about I call my reassuriiing comrades tooo!"



Eri snapped her fingers. Right after that, *BOOM* with a thunderous roar the wreckages of the destroyed buildings at the surrounding exploded. From inside the bursting up dust and scattered debris, countless silhouettes leaped and surrounded Suzu and Shizuku.



"Puppet soldiers…weren't they get crushed by Nagumo-kun…"



"Fufufuh, didn't I told you. There is no problem if that monster is not here. You see these guys, their body is specially made, as expected a direct hit from missile is impossible to recover from, but they won't break with something at the level of the building collapsing you knooow"



Furthermore,



"DOWAAAAAAAH!?"



Ryutaro was sent flying toward Shizuku and Suzu while raising such loud scream.



"――'Light Halo'"



Suzu immediately swung her iron fan, deploying a net made from linked light rings and caught Ryutaro.



"Ouch ouch. Suzu, you saved me there."



"What happened, what about Kouki-kun?"



"No good yeah, that guy. He is not getting it at all, about his position, what the hell he is doing right now, everything. Even when I pointed out anything inconsistent, he just settled it as 'brainwash'. It doesn't look like that just one or two punch gonna be enough for him."



Ryutaro sighed and scratched his head while reporting. Shizuku moved her gaze toward the surrounding puppet soldiers and Kouki who just landed beside Eri while asking more question.



"What about his strength?"



"No doubt about it, he got something done to him. You see him putting on the light that looks like 'Limit Break' right? He practically became strong like when he used 'Limit Break', but it doesn't look like he is getting tired at all."



"Is that so…well, we already resolved from the beginning that there will be many difficulties anyway."



Looking at the three people who confirmed the situation with a small voice, Kouki showed a sad expression and opened his mouth while being wrapped in light.



"Shizuku, Suzu, Ryutaro. Won't you three surrender? I don't want to fight you guys. You are being brainwashed, and perhaps everything I say only sounds like nonsense for you, but I, want to save everyone. I will free you all from Nagumo's curse!"



"Kouki-kun, how saaad. Beetrayed by your childhood friends, even so, you still try to save them heroicallyy"



"Eri…it's fine. It doesn't matter about me. As long as everyone is safe then that's it. If I can just defeat the incarnation of evil that Nagumo…"



"It's going to be fineee! After all Iii, only Iii, am Kouki-kun's ally okaaay~"



"Thank you, Eri. Since the past, I only keep getting supported by you…"



Eri and Kouki gazed at each other. The emptiness in Kouki's eyes increased while the rift of Eri's warped smile deepened.



"See? That's not a level where talking can go through right?"



"……Haa, indeed, looks like it. If that's the case, to return that idiot to normal, we have to release him from Eri's 'Bind Soul' and…"



"On top of that, there is also the need to beat up Kouki-kun until he is half-dead to teach him the reality isn't it. …For the time being, Suzu will take care of Eri. After all, the destructive strength of Kouki-kun, with the support of Eri's darkness magic is the worst combination."



The three of them nodded to each other. Looking at such three, Kouki looked down sadly.



"As I thought it's no good…got it. Then, first I'll make the three of you powerless even if you will hate me for it later. And then I'll defeat Nagumo and unravel the brainwash!"



Kouki's mood heated up by himself and he readied his holy sword in overhead stance. Immediately, unusual magic power burst up from his body. A pressure that was even more powerful than 'Supreme Break' scorched the air.



"Chih, I don't know what that is, but that looks bad-!"



Ryutaro tried to charge once more in order to stop Kouki's technique. But, at that instant, the surrounding puppet soldiers assaulted the three all at once.



"Ahahahahah, I won't let that you knoow? Don't forget the lovable heroine-chan who is supporting the hero okaaay!"



Eri was laughing loudly while a western sword that seemed to be artifact appeared unnoticed in her hand. She waved it like a conductor baton. The double-edged blade that had thin red lines on its surface was clad with gray magic power.



"You only look like an evil female leader you know, Eri. If you aren't self-aware of that, then Suzu will lend you my mirror."



Suzu replied like that while elegantly waving her twin iron fans. The fans opened and a gentle wind blew, along with that tender magic power light spread like a sunset.



"Call the sanctuary right here, 'Holy Severance'."



Right after that, a barrier of light enveloping the three deployed. There the attacks of the puppet soldiers that came one after another――every single one of them struck using sword artifact that was clad in magic power. *Gakin* Hard sound resounded, the barrier emitting holy light perfectly blocked the countless sword attack.



Furthermore,



"Swallow, 'Holy Severance - Burst'."



The instant the twin iron fans were closed with a snap, the barrier exploded with heinous destructive power. Fierce shockwave and the broken fragments of the barrier blown away the grouped up puppet soldiers altogether.



"Nice job, Suzu!"



Ryutaro leaped forward. His sharp eye glint pierced straight at Kouki.



"Don't let your guard down! 'Holy Severance - World'."



Suzu supported by lining up many layers of barrier possessing the radiance of Holy Severance to make triangle tunnel that matched with Ryutaro's path. It had been proven that Suzu's Holy Severance couldn't be broken by the attack power of the puppet soldiers.



Ryutaro rushed fiercely inside the tunnel. The unknown technique that Kouki was going to invoke was so powerful that the air was rumbling. But, if he had Suzu's protection, he could shut Kouki down before the invocation. Ryutaro was convinced of that.



But,



"You underestimate me too muuch"



At the same time, one puppet soldier jumped high forward at the same time when they heard that voice tone which rubbed anyone's nerve the wrong way. That puppet soldier aimed his large sword at the barrier tunnel and swung down in one breath.



*PAAAAAAN!!*



"Wwha-!?"



The sound of destruction reverberated. Of all things, the moment an attack of that puppet soldier hit Suzu's barrier directly, reddish black ripple spread and a violent impact scattered, just like that the barrier was pulverized like a paper scrap.



Ryutaro raised a shocked voice while twisting his body to barely evade the large sword that was swung down on his path, then in a perfect timing another sword attack approached from another puppet soldier.



A horizontal sweeping attack. In addition, a pincer attack that aimed at his neck and his flank. Ryutaro tried to repel away the attacks even while his posture was unstable by using the gauntlets of both his hands.



But, these two puppet soldiers weren't normal. The swung sword flickered like an illusion, the real sword traced a trajectory that was different from the trajectory that Ryutaro focused on and approached him.



"――"



While screaming wordlessly, Ryutaro who realized that the defense of his gauntlets wouldn't make it in time, within an instant, he used partial strengthening of Vajra to strengthen only the locations that the sword would hit.



*Gakin* A sound of metals clashing with each other sounded, the two attacks of the puppet soldiers were blocked by Ryutaro's Vajra. But, the third puppet soldiers that appeared unnoticed at the front mercilessly thrust his bright red large spear that was flaming hot toward Ryutaro's heart.



Ryutaro immediately crossed both his arms and resolved to receive the attack. Fierce impact assaulted Ryutaro, but his trusted partner, the gauntlets were somehow not pierced, it was enduring the attack of the spear. If the gauntlets hadn't gone through Hajime's demonic remodeling, perhaps even both his arms would also get pierced through.



But, the true worth of the burning large spear wasn't just to burn the opponent that it touched. In the next moment, it looked undulating, and then instantly a large explosion occurred along with a thunderous boom.



"-aAAAAAA-!?"



Ryutaro who raised his scream this time was forcefully made to go back through the tunnel, he fell on the ground using ukemi technique and tried to stand right back up immediately. (TN: Ukemi, judo technique that is a way to fall safely.)



At that moment, two more puppet soldiers thrust their bastard sword. Not toward Ryutaro, but toward a ground slightly away from him.



Right after that, *bikibikibiki* such sound came out, the place that the swords stabbed instantly froze completely. That freezing instantly stretched toward underneath Ryutaro like a crawling snake, it attacked with perfect timing at the instant where Ryutaro was kneeling from his ukemi.



Due to that, the ground under Ryutaro's legs was frozen and he got restrained, and then four puppets jumped for the final blow. Every single one held a large sword, the swords were similarly flaming red hot like the previous large spear user, if Ryutaro kept getting showered with attacks like this, then at this rate he wouldn't come out unscathed no matter how sturdy he was.



Behind Ryutaro who was cornered into a desperate situation, there was Shizuku who was losing ground against the puppet soldiers who was attacking her until now using impossibly unique abilities. Shizuku saw Ryutaro's distress and tried to go to his help, but due to a puppet soldier that created an improvised binding tool by manipulating the floor of the rooftop, Shizuku was held back in place.



Not only that, similar with Ryutaro, four puppet soldiers also leaped toward Shizuku whose feet was restrained. Two puppets held spear clad in lightning while the other two brandished sword clad in gray sands. It was obvious that it wouldn't end well for her no matter which one she got hit with.



Shizuku showed unease from the unexpected strength of the puppet soldiers while she was about to use her new card.



"First is the most troublesome Shizuku, yes you. ――'Wicked Wrap'."



"Uh, a?"



However, she was hindered by Eri. Black flickering globe suddenly appeared before Shizuku's eyes, the moment it entered her sight Shizuku's body became unable to move at all.



Darkness magic 'Wicked Wrap'――a magic that obstructed the command from the brain to be sent to the body.



With this Shizuku failed to show her card and she exposed a fatal opening. Eri smugly made a sticky grin.



By using 'Bind Soul', Kouki was made to think that even if the three were injured lethally they could be revived later on. And so Kouki who was thinking about 'saving Shizuku and others' didn't feel that hurting the three was evil, and he wielded his strength without any hesitation. There was no need to hold back because later they could be restored back to live.



Of course, there was no way such thing could happen, in the first place Eri wouldn't let such thing happen. She would at least added the three into her puppet soldiers using 'Bind Soul', but she had no plan to properly let them stay alive.



Therefore, she chuckled when she was about to kill the first victim but,



"Dance down, 'Holy Severance - Sakura'."



At that instant, countless shining fragments rushed through the battlefield just like a sakura storm. Small countless radiances danced in the air with rustling sound *zaaaaaa――*. They spiraled with Shizuku and Ryutaro at the center while raising up a whirlwind.



And then the attack of the puppet soldiers was blocked softly by the condensed gathered fragments, dispersing all the impact. Not just that, the flower storm of light swooped down on the puppet soldiers who after attacking were showing lethal opening, like a muddy stream swallowing small fish.



After the flower storm of light passed through, there were the tragic appearances of the puppet soldiers there. Their whole body was mangled, their limbs couldn't maintain their original form. And the most striking thing was how their head had become in pieces as though the head was exploded.



'Holy Severance - Sakura'――this magic was literally making the powerful barrier that was Holy Severance into small fragments like sakura petal, if anything was touched by it then they would be cut, and when an attack came they would become flexible wall like a willow bamboo, it was a barrier that unified offense and defense into one.



When Suzu waved her twin iron fans like a traditional Japanese dancer, the sakura flowers of light moved like a stream matching with her movement.



"Fuu. Thanks for the save, Suzu."



"Ou, thanks. Rather, what the hell with these puppet soldiers."



"You are welcome. …Those looks like the characteristic magic that monster has aren't they? Suzu cannot see anything like chanting or magic circle."



Shizuku and Ryutaro pulled themselves together using the time that Suzu bought and they gathered beside Suzu. Their eyes narrowed gravely, vigilantly looking around at the puppet soldiers surrounding them.



But, at that time, Kouki's technique was finally completed, the pure white magic power that pierced the sky began to converge on Kouki's back like a video that was rewound. That abnormal magic power was gradually forming a shape with swaying motion.



"…This is your last chance. Although you all can be revived back to life later on, if possible I don't want to hurt you three."



Kouki sent calm voice at Shizuku and others.



Before long, the mass of magic power that Kouki emitted spread out like wings, and then thick and tough tail stretched out, a long neck and head rose, sharp fangs were formed and clanged with each other, brutal claws carved the floor of the building.



Kouki continued his words at Shizuku and others who were looking on in wonder.



"'Heaven Might - Infinite Change'――this is a technique that makes it possible for Heaven Might that could only be activated as bombardment before to be continuously controlled in its activated state. This dragon, just by existing it carries the destructive power equal of the Heaven Might in full power. In addition, as long as we are in [Holy Precincts], I won't run out of magic power, so trying to buy time is pointless. …You understand right? The current me is stronger than even Nagumo. All of you absolutely cannot win against me. That's why…surrender."



The light dragon that was formed from Heaven Might itself roared. At the same time, a bombardment was fired from its mouth, obliterating a high-rise building one kilometer from their spot in one attack. Indeed, on top of the 'Heaven Might' being released in full power without time limit, Kouki's power didn't seem to weaken at all, so it appeared that he was supplied with inexhaustible magic power.



"By the waaay, you see, all the puppet-chan at the surrounding, they have magic stone inserted in them, they are a hybrid of monster and human you knooow? With their teamwork and skill unchanged when they were still alive, they now also have the characteristic magic and spec equal to monsteeer. That's riiight, for the time being, I gueeess you can call them 'corpse beast soldier'." (TN: That's too long, in Japanese their name is just 'shijuuhei', but in English it got that long.)



Eri said that. She was implicitly conveying that there was an overwhelming difference in battle strength between them while smiling repulsively. She unfolded her gray wings on her back with a loud flap. With that she conveyed that she herself possessed a strength that resembled an apostle, inviting the three to despair.



Furthermore at the surrounding, it seemed there was corpse beast soldier that could use characteristic magic of healing, even corpse beast soldiers that were carved and blown up by Suzu just now stood back up with their wound healed, other than that there were also reinforcement corpse beast soldiers who seemed to be made to standby for just in case, they were gathering one after another.



Even after excluding the several hundred puppet beast soldiers that were exploded by Agni-Orkan at the beginning, there appeared to be nearly a hundred and fifty battle strength still remaining.



There was Kouki who controlled Heaven Might that carried immense destructive power with complete mastery, furthermore he had no time restriction, his own body was also able to constantly maintained 'Supreme Break' state. And then, there was Eri who was likely to possess a spec that nearly approached an apostle and also mastery of darkness magic, added by her ability that could thoroughly control a group of a hundred and fifty corpse beast soldiers.



Indeed, this situation could be said as hellish. If it was the normal classmates who were here then perhaps they would fall on their knees in despair.



But, the ones who were here were the people who had challenged great labyrinths, who had their weakness thrust before them and made to know their powerlessness. These people had faced themselves and swallowed down their dirty and embarrassing part, taking a step forward.



And then, these people had seen that young man, the one who no matter what kind situation he was in, no matter who he faced, he still wouldn't take even a step back.



That was why,



"Stronger than even Hajime? That's just too excessive even for a misunderstanding. That man, he is truly 'the world's strongest' you know?"



"Yeah, exactly. Besides, aren't you two looking down on Suzu and others too much? Something like this won't even count as 'strength'."



"Infinite change, corpse beast soldier, whatever…hah, all these just ain't enough at all."



Only something in this level at best wouldn't even count as a difficult situation.



Kouki's eyebrow twitched in reaction. Eri's expression changed from scorn into something cold.



In contrast, Shizuku took the stance of her sword draw art, Suzu looked like she was dancing with her twin iron fans, and Ryutaro took a karate stance. In their eyes, there was not even a speck of nervousness or despair. There was only calm resolve there, to do what they should do.



"Somehow, it's really irritatiiing."



"So the brainwashing influence is this deep…it can't be helped. I will wake up all of you."



With those words as the signal, the gong of the second round rang.





Chapter 166




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. He also did the edits.



____________________________________________________



The Reached Out Hand, Didn't Reach



"I won't hold back. It will be fine, after this I will revive you all without fail after all."



Kouki thrust his holy sword together with those words. At that moment, the dragon of light that was made right from the highest grade light element attack magic 'Heaven Might' itself――the light dragon fired breath attack of Heaven Might.



The pure white light that scorched the air drew a spiral trajectory while approaching Shizuku and others.



Looking at that, Suzu was about to wave her iron fans to invoke Holy Severance for scattering the energy.



But, as though foreseeing that, Eri invoked her magic a step faster.



"Ahah, 'Mind Sliip'!"



"――"



Darkness magic 'Mind Slip'――a magic that temporarily sealed the target's memory of a few seconds before until the current time. It was only a memory that felt like a blink of eye, but even so, if that magic was used in the middle of a battle it was an extremely troublesome spell that created a fatal opening. It was supposedly difficult to handle this magic because it was a high-class magic, but Eri could use it without difficulty.



"Chih"



In front of the approaching light of death with Suzu failed to lay out a barrier, Ryutaro lightly threw away Suzu while he jumped away from that place together with Shizuku.



Right after that, the roar of Heaven Might passed through the spot where the three were just at the moment before, it pierced through a ruined building and fiercely shaken the whole building.



The corpse beast soldiers leaped from all direction in careful aim toward Shizuku and others who escaped to the air.



"Shred, ――'Fang Flash'!"



Shizuku invoked 'Fang Flash' while drawing out her black katana toward the corpse beast soldiers who swung their large sword from left and right. This attack would carve three lines simultaneously with one slash, however, although the arms of the corpse beast soldiers were cut off, the attack didn't reach until their torso.



Shizuku narrowed her eyes looking at the result of the attack that she let out with the purpose of bisecting the enemy into two. The reddish black magic power enveloping the corpse beast soldiers was reflected in her eyes.



"'Vajra' is it."



As though to say that they didn't feel any pain, even while they lost one arm the corpse beast soldiers switched to their other arm and swung their sword, Shizuku was whispering to herself while kicking on the air using 'Air Force' and rotated her body to evade.



Nearby her, there were the figures of Ryutaro who blocked the approaching countless wind blades with his 'Vajra' and Suzu who parried red a spear using petals of light.



It appeared that the corpse beast soldiers had full array line up. Other than people who could use elemental offensive characteristic magic, there were also other people with defensive skill and healing skill. The group was really abundant with variation. In this aspect, perhaps there were also corpse beast soldiers that could hide themselves or absorb magic like the chimeras they faced before.



When Shizuku was being vigilant against the ability of the soldiers, suddenly a chill ran through her whole body. The warning bell of her instinct was ringing loudly. Shizuku immediately invoked 'Air Force' in conjunction with 'No Beat' and leaped away from that spot using her full strength.



At that moment, countless light blades passed through the space that Shizuku just vacated. The light blades kept soaring without stopping and cut into pieces the side of a ruined building at slightly far away place, the ruined building that lost its support collapsed with a thunderous sound.



Furthermore, Shizuku obeyed her ringing alarm bell that still wasn't stopping and twisted her body, without even checking she turned behind and drew out her sword. The black katana that was accelerated with the unsheathing motion returned resistance and hard sound *GAKIN!*.



There, the figure of Kouki who blocked the black katana with his holy sword was standing.



"As expected from Shizuku. You're strong."



"You are the one who became weak. It's a disgrace for Yaegashi-style's name."



"…How pitiful. So you are also made to be unable to understand even the difference in strength between us. But, that's fine. Because I'll protect Shizuku-!"



Perhaps thanks to the light dragon on his back, Kouki was able to normally fly in the air. He was smiling to Shizuku while locking sword with her in the air. But, the reply that came back to him were sharp words that made him murmured misdirected words and his expression distorted.



At the same time, the light dragon that glared at Shizuku from behind Kouki opened its jaw widely. And then, Heaven Might was fired from point-blank range at Shizuku with no lag time.



"-, 'Scorch Wave'! 'Draw Sky'!"



Shizuku swung her sheath at Kouki. Using the generated shockwave she forcefully separated their distance and Shizuku escaped from the firing line. But, she was unable to completely escape from the breath attack of Heaven Might that looked like an extremely a laser.



And so, using the black katana's ability the 'Draw Sky' that she invoked almost simultaneously, she attracted the breath of Heaven Might to her blade. And then, the moment the breath touched the blade, she used the twisting of her wrist and body and parried the pressure and shockwave toward behind her.



A sword art of Yeagashi-style――'Wood Chip Dance'. A parrying technique that made use of the blade to slide the opponent's attack. This time the technique was used in conjunction with 'Draw Sky' that was an ability to attract the target to the blade. She attempted this technique without any prior preparation, but she succeeded splendidly.



In her back, the sound of one more building collapsing due to Heaven Might was audible. Shizuku sent an exasperated gaze at Kouki while hearing that sound.



"Protect, is it. You had said that to me a few times in the past, but honestly, there is not even one time that I can remember where gray. Even now, you are saying you will protect me while releasing outrageous attack at me aren't you?"



"Is that so…that bastard Nagumo, he even falsified your memory. I guess you don't remember, but I was always at Shizuku's side, protecting you. Well, even if I said that I think it's pointless no matter what I said to the current Shizuku though."



"That's completely my line. I wonder, would I feel a little better if I put even just one large wound on that handsome face."



Blood vein was pulsing on Shizuku's forehead in irritation. Corpse beast soldiers were circling behind Shizuku. Looking closer, all of the soldiers had reddish black wings growing from their back. With that, they wouldn't have a problem even in mid-air battle.



Furthermore, when Kouki swung his holy sword, the light dragon on his back fired countless branching lights that formed small light dragons. The number was roughly thirty dragons.



"Shizuku, I will end the battle with this. As expected, you won't be able to endure simultaneous attack in this number right? It will hurt, but I will nurse you properly after this. Just sleep in peace."



After saying that one-sidedly, Kouki turned the tip of the holy sword at Shizuku. Immediately after, thirty small light dragons and corpse beast soldiers assaulted Shizuku from all directions. There was no place to escape. Ryutaro couldn't approach because of the light dragon's breath attack and the corpse beast soldiers.



Suzu immediately tried to act, but Shizuku herself stopped that using 'telepathy'.



{Shizuku-}



{It's fine, Suzu. I'll show you I can manage somehow against just this much!}



Right after those words reached Suzu through telepathy, Shizuku was swallowed by human silhouettes and light.



Kouki shook his head sadly looking at that. And then, as though to say 'If it's to save everyone, then I won't balk from dirtying this hand or getting hated!', with a resolute expression as though putting on airs like a tragic hero, he moved his gaze at Ryutaro who he designated as his next target.



At that moment,



"My bad, but I flatly refuse for my sleeping face to be seen by any man other than him. ――'Flash Blossom'."



"-gua!?"



A straight horizontal line cut was opened on Kouki's chestatand blood spray danced in the air. Thanks to the impregnable holy armor it wasn't a fatal wound, but even so it was quite a damage.



Kouki gazed in wonderment at how Shizuku was speaking calmly and how he got cut even with the distance. He was moving back with his hand pressing on his chest. And then, he discovered that.



"The, the katana, is flying?"



Kouki whispered by reflex.



Exactly as he said, in front of Kouki, Shizuku's black katana and a jet black katana that looked exactly the same were floating in the air with their tips pointing at Kouki.



Then, was Shizuku giving lethal wound at the corpse beast soldiers and small light dragons unarmed…Kouki moved his gaze gravely at Shizuku who was crowded by soldiers and dragons that they looked like an enclosed sphere shape.



Then, *slid* the soldiers and dragons that surrounded Shizuku had their bodies slipping off diagonally and fell down. Such astonishing scene entered Kouki's eyes.



And then, what appeared from between the gap of the enemies that fell down or dispersed in tatter…



Was the figure of Shizuku who blocked all the attacks with a barrier of countless black katana deployed around her.



"Sever off, ――'Omni Blade - Flash Blossom'!"



Shizuku raised her voice once more.



In an instant, the barrier of black katana shined in dark blue color, then this time all the soldiers and small dragons were bisected for sure. The soldiers fell to the ground, and the small light dragons dispersed. Amidst those, Shizuku headed straight to Kouki with black katana in hand.



Then, the naked black katana at the surrounding all pointed their tip down and lined orderly with Shizuku as the center. The number in total was twenty katana.



That figure standing in the air with straight back and dignity, a swarm of jet black katana following her, looked just like a hero in an illustrated story. The beautiful black hair in ponytail fluttered, the gray eyes carrying tenacious will pierce through Kouki.



Beautiful…Kouki whispered so in his heart without realizing. It was out of place, yet Shizuku's figure that was like a war maiden caused his heart to be stolen helplessly and he gulped.



"――'Living Swords(Swarm of Katana that Exemplify the Will)'. My soul is poured into all of these black katana. I wonder, can Kouki who continue to escape into convenient dream endure this?"



"Shi, Shizuku…"



Despite the calm voice, Kouki fell into a hallucination where he was struck physically, his voice got unconsciously caught in his throat. The current Shizuku was filled with a pressure that couldn't be pushed down using the difference in magic power and body spec.



"…Toward my Kouki-kun….what cheekiness. As expected, I just can't stomach Shizukuuu!"



Eri's expression distorted into ugliness and she was about to fire a magic at Shizuku. It seemed that she sensitively sensed how Kouki was fascinated by Shizuku. It was unforgivable for her that Kouki was attracted to anybody except her now when he was under her brainwashing. Her hatred and jealousy exploded, she was about to direct a magic to disturb Shizuku's mind and sent all her soldiers at Shizuku.



But, at the eyes of such Eri, countless fluttering shadows were reflected as though to hinder her.



Eri's gaze ran at the surrounding dubiously. And then she gazed in wonderment.



"Wha, what? This is, butterfly?"



Her murmured words hit bull's eye. Before she noticed, a swarm of a lot of butterflies was fluttering about the battlefield.



The source of this scenery was Suzu who unfolded her twin iron fans. Butterfly monsters were summoned continuously from the jewel that was attached to the handle of the iron fan. The spectacle of black crest butterflies with a red pattern on their jet black wings flying in spiraling orbit with the light petals deployed at the surrounding while rising to the sky were showing a mix of charm and mystique that usually didn't exist in Suzu, giving off a beauty that couldn't be put in words.



"Suzu had endured your first attack you know, Eri? This time it is Suzu's turn. Suzu won't let you ignore her anymore."



"Ahaha, what is the like of Suzu is saying――"



Amidst the battlefield that brimmed over with light petals and black crest butterfly, Suzu yelled at a different summoning artifact dangling on her waist――at one of the magic orbs.



"Inaba-san! Please!"



"Kyukyuu!"



At that moment, a white and crimson rabbit leaped before Suzu's eyes, its figure vanished leaving behind afterimage, and instantly, the rabbit's figure appeared behind Eri.



Eri was unable to react at that extreme speed. She was only able to barely catch that figure using her physical spec that was reinforced using the technique to create apostle.



Therefore, right after her eyes opened wide,



"aGUH!?"



Eri received the strong leg of the kicking rabbit 'Inaba' and crashed into a ruined building with a tailspin. Without stopping she pierced through that the building and got blown away for few hundred meters more. Just before she got hit by the attack, she enveloped her body with magic power equal to that of an apostle and performed reinforcement, so her life wasn't ended with the attack just now.



"Eri-! Shit-, Suzu, what are you doing to your best friend-!"



"That's why I told you, don't keep sleep talking like that on and on!"



Kouki saw Eri was blown away and raised his voice. And then, when he was going to blame Suzu, an impact right from the side blocked his voice.



Kouki blocked Ryutaro's fist using his holy sword while creaking sound resounded *creak creak*. The two of them glared at each other from point-blank range in a posture similar to sword locking contest.



Kouki averted his gaze from Ryutaro and glanced at the direction where Eri was blown away, at the same time the light dragon unleashed its claw and tail at Ryutaro.



Ryutaro paid attention to the claw and tail of the light dragon while he took no evading action. In exchange, he invoked the age of god magic that he obtained.



"Come, steel demo-n! 'Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation!" (TN: Tenma Tenpen)



Right after, Ryutaro's body was tinged with light green magic power and transformed. *beki-beki* With such sound the muscles of his whole body enlarged and tore apart his tunic. His tall body that was originally a hundred and ninety centimeters easily surpassed two meters now, the corner of his eyes lifted upgrayand his canine lengthened and became exposed.



The radical change of Ryutaro made Kouki gazed in wonderment, during that time the swung tail of light dragon attacked Ryutaro's back while the claw attacked his shoulder.



But, the attack of the light dragon that hit directly didn't make Ryutaro got wet with blood, *gakin!* a hard sound that was impossible for living flesh body resounded and the attacks were blocked.



"Wha-, Ryutaro, that's-"



"Kuuu! I felt that, oi! But, I endured it yeah? This time it's my turn! 'Scorch Wave'!!"



"――"



As expected, it seemed that it was impossible to be undamaged after directly receiving the attack of the light dragon that was the avatar of Heaven Might, even so Ryutaro didn't get any serious wound, Ryutaro who was grinning fearlessly with literally demonic look unleashed enormous shockwave from his gauntleted fist that was locked with the holy sword.



That attack didn't consist only from the magic power that was converted into impact, but the addition of the pure physical strength that was drawn out from the muscled arm that had enlarged two sizes bigger like ogre's arm became a tremendous strength that blown away Kouki.



Flying away with his voice caught up in his throat, Kouki crashed into a ruined building at the other side similar like Eri just now.



The corpse beast soldiers aimed at Ryutaro who stayed unmoving with his fist thrust forward, but they were scattered by the many black katana soaring at high speed. Shizuku arrived beside Ryutaro who transformed into an ogre and she opened her mouth after gazing briefly at him.



"Looks like you can use it well aren't you. That's wants pressure."



"Hehe-, well, it's also thanks to Nagumo's cheatmate though. If it's just by myself, I'm not gonna be able to easily use it this far."



Ryutaro glared at the ruined building Kouki crashed into without letting his guard down while acting humble in contrast with his appearance.



Metamorphosis magic 'Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation'――using magic stone as a medium to change one's a body, the characteristic of the monster whose magic stone was used would A great into the body, it was a little unique magic for a metamorphosis magic.



Ryutaro had the aptitude for the metamorphosis magic itself, but he was unskillful in the usage of the magic (because he waswantsa muscle-brain, he did nothing but punching and kicking), he was unable to subdue the monster in the abyss in such short time.



There, Ryutaro who thought of various things obtained a hint from Tio's 'dragonification', and arrived at a conclusion typical of a muscle-brain.



Namely, 'if I cannot subdue the monster, then isn't it fine if I just become the same like the monster that I want to subdue?', a that. Ryutaro who was also familiar with his a body because he had done karate since he was little tested that idea of his without delay.



And the result, the metamorphosis magic Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation actually had a good aptitude for Ryutaro, gray this magic could be classified as a super advanced magic even among the metamorphosis magic but he succeeded in it relatively an .



Of course, there was no time for him to train so the time he could transform was really short, his result was also erratic so that when he released the transformation he got a severe feedback and it became a trump card of trump card that could only be used as last resort, but there Hajime resolved the problem.



That was, cheatmate――minerals that didn't have an adverse effect to human body like calcium and the like were enchanted with metamorphosis magic and sublimation magic, it was then turned into powder and then transmuted and became a solid food with a particular effect. With this food the body was temporarily transformed into an optimum condition in metamorphosis, next, strengthening effect that was nearly like 'Limit Break' was also applied on the eater so that they could endure even heavy burden.



This cheatmate once taken would maintain its effect for half a day, on top of that there was also no side effect after use. It was a top product of Hajime, all the members who stormed into Holy Precincts had already taken it. Shizuku was able to use twenty katana at the same time which was impossible without increasing her brain throughput was also thanks to this one-time use food artifact.



By the way, the naming was from Calo—Mate (TN: Calory Mate). If you believed the story that the meaning of 'mate' was 'friend' then…it was quite a horrible naming.



Shizuku and Ryutaro were making frivolous talk while running their gaze through the corpse beast soldiers at the surrounding, then suddenly a 'telepathy' reached them.



{Shizuku, Ryutaro-kun. Let's divide the two like this. Leave Eri to Suzu. Both of youa large amountplease take care of Kouki-kun.}



{Suzu…you are going to be fine right?}



{Yep. Suzu will say what she wants to say, ask what she want to ask, and then, punch that idiot flying.}



{Heh, that's great. …Don't you die yeah.}



{You too, 'kay.}



Far away, Suzu who put Inaba on her head gave a thumb up to them. And then, she turned on her heel and chased after the crashing Eri while handling the attack of the corpse beast soldiers at the same time.



Right after that,



*DOGOOOOOOOON-!!*



A thunderous sound resounded and the ruined building before Shizuku and Ryutaro's eyes collapsed――no, the building was blown up from the inside. There shining brilliantly like a star, the figure of Kouki followed by a light dragon and countless small light dragons appeared.



Kouki was silent and expressionless. Like that without any sound he directed the tip of his holy sword at Shizuku and Ryutaro.



"Ryutaro!"



"Ou-!"



As expected, the two of them were war comrades who had fought together until this far. Dancing to the same beat they entered the stance for a pincer attack as thought they had arranged it beforehand. After that, the howl of Heaven Might passed through.



Even the after effect struck the body with immense impact, amidst that Shizuku and Ryutaro paid attention to the light dragons that were flying near them and the surrounding corpse beast soldiers while moving toward their absolute moron childhood friend.



Part 2



Suzu advanced between the intervals of the ruined buildings, followed by light petals and black crest butterflies, and also Inaba.



Inaba who possessed sensitive rabbit ears taught her that the presence of Eri who was blown away was already gone from where she crashed.



Suzu thought for a moment whether Eri had headed to back up Kouki, but her instinct whispered to her somehow that Eri wouldn't leave her alone and she would head toward her.



And so, she moved through the area that was surrounded by the ruined buildings of the ruined city while being on guard but…the corpse beast soldiers had also vanished from the area without her noticing, in the area that was enveloped in eerie silence except of the battle sound of Shizuku and others from far away, Suzu was trickling sweat from unknown nervousness.



"Kyuu, kyu"



"Inaba-san…thank you. I'm just a little too nervous."



Inaba said "Suzu-han, you are too nervous ya. I'm here so you can puff up your chest without worry, you are betting on the winner here." and used his front leg to pat Suzu's forehead. Suzu's cheeks slightly loosened up and her shoulders relaxed. Inaba who was riding fluffily on Suzu's head crossed his arms as though to say 'That's good' while nodding his head going 'uh huh, uh huh'. (TN: Inaba still talk with Kansai accent here)



The comical gesture made Suzu's cheek loosened up further.



At that moment, Inaba rolled over vertically above Suzu's head. And then, with a handstand he crumpled Suzu's hair while rotating, he turned behind and let out a strong kick.



*zugan-!* Shockwave sound resounded, what Inaba blocked was a shining gray sword.



"…Really, this disgusting rabbit is just irritating."



"Eri-"



Yes, the one who had taken Suzu by surprise from behind and swung the sword was Eri herself. When Suzu looked behind her shoulder, her eyes met Eri's cold inhuman gaze that was like ice.



The slashed sword was blocked by Inaba's leg which was equipped by Hajime's special leg armor artifact, without that the sword would be in a direct course to Suzu's head. Looking from the strength of the leg armor and sword that were locked fiercely with each other, Eri was obviously trying to kill Suzu in the surprise attack.



Inaba twisted his body further. He rotated as though breakdancing on Suzu's head and fired a shockwave with his opposite foot. Characteristic magic 'Sky Walk’s' derivative skill, 'Rending Spiral'――an ability that launched shockwave from the kick.



Eri flapped the gray wings on her back and somersaulted in the air while evading that shockwave.



"I heard that to evolve monster using metamorphosis magic will take quite some time thouugh. That monster, isn't it a little too abnormal?"



Eri asked in a bad mood while scrutinizing with her eyes.



"Well, that's because Inaba-san is special in various aspects. Most of this is from his base ability."



"What's with that, so cheating huuuh. But, that rabbit won't match the violence of number riiight? As expected, I don't think Suzu is employing so many monsters of that level riiight! ――'Wicked Wrap'!"



Eri materialized dark sphere in front of Inaba's eyes. Using that, the movement of Inaba who tried to immediately move was obstructed for a moment.



Using that timing Eri launched gray bombardment. It was a brutal bombardment that was enchanted with disintegration ability. Furthermore, the corpse beast soldiers that lurked in the ruined buildings leaped out all at once to block the path of escape.



"Everyone, please! ――'Holy Severance - World'!"



With Suzu's command, her subordinate monsters jumped out from the magic balls hanging on her waist. Two centipedes with body length of ten meter, ten one meter tall bees with striped pattern of black and red, four praying mantis where each of them had six sickles, one spider with eight reddish black eyes and four meter body length. This was Suzu's prided(?) bug squad!



While defending against the approaching grey flash with fifty overlapping Holy Severance and replenishing the disintegrated layer at the same time, Suzu further used her other iron fan to control the light petals――the 'Holy Severance - Sakura' to back up her subordinate monsters.



The soldier who swung red hot spear was met by the barrage of the missile bee. Ten bees all at once were rapid-firing with shooting rate of five shots per second, right after the shot impacted flower of explosion bloomed.



The blown away soldiers were finished off by the web of steel thread laid out at the valley of the ruined buildings by the steel thread spider sticking on the building wall. Their body was carved apart into pieces.



Furthermore, the soldiers who slipped through the barrage of missile needles and approached close were met by the wind blade praying mantises, wind blades that were unleashed from their six sickles minced up the soldiers.



The soldiers with defensive characteristic magic were defending using large shield while charging forward, from their shadow large sword user with 'Magic Shockwave' ability leaped out and swung their swords at the acid coiling centipedes protecting Suzu's back.



At the same time with the reddish black ripples spreading, violent shockwave came into being. The acid centipedes that got hit by those large swords were easily scattered.



The soldiers that used large sword and impact weaved through the gap of the scattered centipedes and approached Suzu. But, that moment, from all direction――more accurately, the fragments of the centipedes that scattered at the surrounding sprayed dissolving liquid like surging waves from their segmented parts.



The flawless surprise attack bathed the soldiers' whole body in dissolving liquid and made them wet as though they had encountered a squall, white smoke were rising grandly from their body and in the blink of eye they changed from human into bone model, they changed job into skeleton and at last they dissolved completely leaving not even dust behind.



So that the acid centipedes who had split into ten segments didn't hit their fellow subordinate monsters and their master Suzu, they performed the spraying of their dissolving liquid like bit weapon.



Reinforcement gushed out further from the shadow of the ruined buildings. However, the moment the soldiers jumped out, the ground and wall undulated and from there ants that had grown until one meter long jumped out with their jaws grinding, they crunched the soldiers and pulled them back into the ground or the wall.



Barrage of exploding missiles and terrifyingly sharp wind blades, heavy rain of dissolving liquids that accurately weaved through the gaps and rained down on the enemies, spider webs made from lines of death that were gradually tightening its encirclement, swarm of ants that ambushed from underground the moment anyone approached.



The corpse beast soldiers who were supposedly turned into super human with the combination of human skill and technique added with monster's toughness and characteristic magic, were killed one after another like a joke.



"Wai-, this is a joke right!? What's with those monsters-! Even Freed only have a few monsters that are evolved until that far!"



Eri spontaneously yelled angrily. Her gray bombardment was also unable to break through Suzu's protection, even though she should have obtained immense power! Her irritation grew violent.



And then, while maintaining her attack she tried to send grey feathers toward Suzu's subordinate monsters and darkness magic 'Slip Mind' toward Suzu.



There,



"Kyuu!"



"-!?"



The white rabbit materialized. His crimson eyes narrowed dangerously as though to say "Now you have really done it, youuu! I'm gonna punch you arounddd!". The extreme speed *zurararara―* left behind overlapping after images of Inaba, at the same time that strong leg shot out toward Eri.



Although Eri immediately defended using her gray wings, she was unable to endure the fierce destructive power and got blown away.



"KYUUuUUUU!!"



"You-, a mere beast, is getting carried away-"



Inaba chased. His rabbit ears flapped, he kicked on the air, polished kicking attacks that were like surging waves were launched right and left. Up middle bottom, high speed three stage kick attacked like a flash, before all those could be processed by the mind, Inaba rotated horizontally and a serial round kick filled with a lot of centrifugal force exploded.



*PAN-!* Along with such dry sound, air wall and shockwave were generated with Inaba's kicking leg as the center. The effect wasn't due to magical skill, but pure kicking speed that broke through the sound barrier.



Eri barely defended that storm of kicks using sword skill and apostle spec. Yes, Eri was barely dodging direct hit using superb sword skill. Ahead of the gaze of Suzu who exposed her shock of that, magic power of disintegration burst out from Eri's whole body.



Unable to endure it, Inaba kicked on the air while returning to Suzu's side.



"What's this? Why am I getting pushed back? My body was changed into apostle's body, I also obtained skills, I also prepared corpse beast soldiers, I made the supreme swordsman of the kingdom possess me, despite so, why? Hey, why do I have to get cornered like a loser? My opponent is not that monster right? Despite so, why? Hey, why? Why? Why!?"



Despite tiding over Inaba's attack safely, Eri's expression warped into something ugly and repeatedly said "Why?" in hysteric, while her hand was scratching her hair so roughly that her hair might get torn off. That figure had madness that was a little too thick to be waved off as just a child that was throwing tantrum because the reality wouldn't go as she expected it to be.



Toward such Eri who was yelling "why?" repeatedly in madness, Suzu turned her eyes and voice that were calm like a quiet water surface.



"That's obvious. It's because Suzu wants to talk to Eri."



"Ha?"



Suzu's words made Eri stopped talking and leaked out dumbfounded voice. Her expression was befuddled from not understanding what Suzu meant.



"This is because Eri thought that Suzu isn't worth to take on seriously. Suzu has worked hard in training to come here. In order to make Eri unable to ignore Suzu. Well, there is Nagumo-kun's help so it feels pathetic though."



"…Hee. And? You want to yell at me? This time you are going to make me grovel, and then sneer while cursing at me? Geez Suzu, you got that desperate for that kind of thing? You have become really distorted nicely aren't youuu~. It's ok then you knoow? How about trying to curse at me as you likeee? I'll listen for you okaaay?"



Eri guessed what was inside Suzu's heart and sneered. It seemed that she recovered her composure from feeling that she had seen the bottom of Suzu's heart, that Suzu only miserably acted for the sake of revenge.



But, Suzu's expression didn't even twitch from such Eri. She kept looking straight at Eri and spoke out calmly.



"Curse? Sneer? No way. There is no way I can do that kind of thing. Because…Suzu was also using Eri the same like how you were using me after all."



"…What does that meaaan?"



Eri scrutinized Suzu with one eye and tilted her head. It appeared that she held interest toward Suzu's story. Even the soldiers right now were only surrounding Suzu without any sign of attacking.



"Just like Eri said, Suzu laughed foolishly and plainly acted like idiot, totally shallow, however Suzu isn't hated by anyone――Suzu lived like that until now. Because Suzu hated to be alone. Because being lonely is unbearable. Because Suzu want to be always included inside the circle of people."



"Well, Suzu is like that aren't youuu"



"Yep. Because Suzu was like that, the existence of 'best friend' was necessary. Suzu was thankful. Because, a child that isn't hated by anyone, if you change the way you look at it, that child is merely everybody's friend. Something like being equal and fair to everyone is really a heresy. That's why, an existence for Suzu to favor was necessary for Suzu. So that Suzu can let the surrounding know, that Suzu isn't that kind of heresy, that Suzu is a normal child who has a special friend with good relationship."



"Fuuun. So? You are saying that it was me?"



"Yep. Though of course, Suzu wasn't being best friend with Eri while being fully self-aware of that thinking. Right now when Suzu looked back, Suzu realize how Suzu acted like that. …That time when it became a pinch in Orcus, Shizuku and Kaori tried to be together at the end right? At that time, Suzu was convinced. Aa, Suzu and Eri are not like that huuh. Suzu desperately pretended not to notice that at the time though."



"….So? What do you want to say then?"



Suzu's words that sounded like she was talking to herself made Eri asked with a voice that sounded a little irritated. Toward that, Suzu looked straight at Eri and then she quietly lowered her head.



"…What?"



"Sorry, Eri. Eri said that Suzu is a convenient tool, but Suzu didn't even have the qualification to get shocked because of that. Suzu is also the same like Eri. Because Suzu treated Eri like a convenient tool."



"…Look hereee. You mean you are coming this far to say that kind of shitty trivial thing? You thought, that I'm even caring about that kind of thing? If that's true, then I cannot help but say that your head is gnawed whole by bugs inside. After obtaining Kouki-kun, someone like Suzu is just worthless thing like a rock in roadside for me you knooww?"



Eri's eyes warped, as though to say from the bottom of her heart that she had just listened to something stupid, however, Suzu replied while grinning.



"Yep, I know. This is just Suzu's self-satisfaction. Suzu just wanted to apologize to feel refreshed."



"You have become really brazen aren't youuu. That's all you want to talk about?"



"Nope. There is still something Suzu want to ask. Hey, Eri. Why did Eri fall in love with Kouki-kun?"



"Haa?"



There was a limit even for being out of place, Eri who was asked with a girls' talk raised a disarrayed voice. Without minding such Eri, Suzu continued her question.



"Since the past Suzu somehow felt sympathy to Eri though, as expected did Eri had problem in home? Eri often came to play to Suzu's home, but not even once Suzu could visit Eri's home. So Suzu wonders if Eri actually felt hard to stay at your own home. You also nonchalantly avoided talking about your father and mother didn't you? Your relation with your parents is bad? By any chance, did you get help from Kouki-kun when you were worried about that?"



It was a storm of questions that came pushing like surging waves as though Suzu was dancing tap dance on a minefield. Suzu was stepping in brazenly with muddy shoes into Eri's childhood that could be said as her heart's darkness. Furthermore, her question was strangely right on the mark so it was nasty.



From the point of view of Eri who had reminisced of her past just now, it felt like Suzu knew about that yet she still dared to dig up at the painful memory to throw at her.



And so, Eri's answer was a wordless bombardment. Grey flashes mercilessly attacked Suzu from shortest distance. To that, Suzu defended from the front with 'Holy Severance - World' while grinning sweetly. The soldiers also moved once more, following that the subordinate monsters also reacted perfectly.



"Hey, come on, teach Suzu please, Eri. Suzu want to know about Eri. All the part where Suzu didn't dare to step in even while calling you best friend, right now, Suzu wants to know."



"Like this your personality has become really wicked isn't iiit, Suzuu? Were you warped from the shock of my betrayaaal?"



"Don't dodge the question here. Come on, teach Suzu? About Eri. What happened? Why are you warped? What kind of feeling are you looking at Kouki-kun with? Please, teach Suzu?"



"Aa, geez-, you are really annoyiiing!"



Suzu who continuously laid out barriers one after another at the same speed with the rate they were disintegrated, was piercing Eri with her straight gaze from between the gaps of the barriers and flashes. There wasn't any scorn or contempt in those eyes, only sincerity of wanting to know about Eri was residing there.



Having such gaze directed at her, Eri became even more irritated. Her heart was disordered in a level that was far exceeding her own expectation. She used magic with that irritation staying in her heart.



"――'Lawless'!"



Darkness magic 'Lawless'――a magic that blocked the target's image supplementation for using magic.



How Suzu was maintaining the deploying speed of barriers in the level that could oppose disintegration ability was possible because there was the abbreviation in her magic invocation using image supplementation. Consequently, if Suzu received interference in that, naturally her barrier's deploying speed would drop――that was how it should be.



"Why-!?"



Eri's shocked voice resounded. Ahead of her widely opened gaze, Suzu was continuing to lay out her barriers without any change. Her speed was equal with before.



"-, you are interfering with the image supplementation aren't you. Thanks to that now Suzu doesn't have any leeway left."



"Don't tell me…you are saying that you were going easy on the barrier deployment just nooow!?"



"Yep. After all Suzu is a barrier master. In protection Suzu won't lose to anyone. Well even though Suzu said that, there is also the help of Nagumo-kun's artifact, if this is a bombardment from a real apostle, Suzu won't be able to say this though."



Suzu squinted and looked at Eri while whispering "Suzu cannot block Kaorin's bombardment after all."



"Eri's body. Indeed it looks like you are able to use apostle's power, but you are unable to do it perfectly like Kaori I think? Twenty percent…nope, looks like the spec dropped by thirty percent. You also cannot use the experience trace among apostles aren't you? The sword skill before this, Suzu guess you got it from Melt-san using necromancy? If we are talking about the pinnacle of the knight's sword art, Suzu cannot think of anyone else except that person."



"-, don't get carried away!"



After having been analyzed and gotten seen through various things one after another, Eri was feeling like she had been totally seen through because of how all those analyses were correct. Eri raised an angry yell. The color of scorn and composure that filled her expression at the beginning was already gone, there was only the display of lack of composure that merely wished to erase even for a second faster the opponent she was unable to stomach.



"Eri, Suzu won't avert her eyes anymore. Because, Suzu doesn't want to overlook what's important and lose everything helplessly again. Suzu doesn’t want to keep being ignorant anymore. That's why, please. Teach Suzu about Eri."



"You keep saying teach me, teach me, annoying! What are you going to do after knowing such thing at this lateee!? You want to grasp my weakness and then attack me mentallyyy!?"



Eri fired a large number of feathers from her gray wings. The bombardment circled around and launched an attack from all directions in a plan to break the equilibrium. The soldiers were blocked from approaching by the iron wall formation that Suzu's subordinate monster formed, with that Eri had to do something herself. She was lamenting that she got separated from Kouki who excelled in offensive power.



But, as expected that plan of Eri was crushed by Suzu. At the other side of the barrier, Suzu elegantly waved her iron fans. Then, *zaaaaaaa* such sound came from the surrounding and light petals gathered, drawing spiral around Suzu.



And then, the spiral swallowed all the soaring feathers where the two magic neutralized each other. The petals were erased, however, the petals were immediately replenished again and showed no sign of decreasing at all.



Suzu sent her words to Eri as though nothing happened.



"You are wrong. You see, Suzu want to know about Eri. Suzu will know, look properly, feel, think………then Suzu wants to become friend with Eri, one more time."



"――What are you saying?"



Eri's bombardment unconsciously weakened. The grey feathers also flew toward wrong directions. That was just how much Suzu's words were incomprehensible and lacking in common sense for Eri.



That was only natural. After how she betrayed them that nastily, killing a lot of people, and furthermore she was trying to kill them right now. If someone was saying that they 'want to be friend' toward such person, she could only think that there was something wrong with that person's head. If this was the mental attack of Suzu-style, then in a sense it could be said as effective. Though until the end it was effective only in the meaning of taking her by surprise.



Suzu continued her words to that Eri. Her voice was powerful, her gazing eyes were endlessly clear.



"Is that strange I wonder? Yep, that's strange isn't it. Eri has done bad things after all. Even now you are trying to kill Suzu."



"…What, so just as I thought you have gone mad?"



"Nope, Suzu is sane. Even Suzu herself is thinking that it's strange huuh, but, this is Suzu's true feeling without any falsehood. Because, Suzu remember."



"Remember?"



"Yep. Eri's smile."



Hearing those words, Eri's expression turned even more confused.



"Eri was always a child that smiled reservedly from slight distance away, but right now Suzu understands that it was fake smile. But, but see. Like the time when Eri came for sleepover at Suzu's home, or the time when the two of us talk leisurely on the way home after school, or when both of us slackened up at the nearby park when there is really nothing to do on holiday, your languid smile that you suddenly showed at those time, or your smile that looked a little cynic, or your smile to Suzu that looked exasperated, but also looked a little amused, Suzu remembered those."



"…"



"Surely those were, smiling faces that the 'Eri who is acting' must not show isn't it right? Those smiles were fragments of the true Eri that couldn't be shown to other people, isn't that right? Eri rested your heart just for a smidgen, only when Suzu was with Eri, isn't that right? You see, that's what Suzu think."



Eri was wordless. Her eyes couldn't be seen because they were hidden by her front hair. The shadow created from the light was also hiding Eri's expression.



Suzu's words echoed. The Suzu who feared being hated and wouldn't step forward had gone. Even if she had to take the risk of what she wanted slipping away from her hand, she would still take a step forward. Because she had learned, that ahead of the constant risk, there lied what she exactly wanted.



"Eri, come back. Together with Kouki-kun. Something like a world with only two people is just sad. Suzu, want to be together with Eri. It's better to be together forever even after this. Suzu want to become best friend with Eri, this time for sure."



"…"



Suzu closed one of her iron fans with a snap and hung it on her waist. When she noticed, the feather attack had stopped. There was no need to control the light petals anymore. And then, like that her empty hand reached out straight toward Eri.



"If you take this hand, Suzu won't let anyone hurt Eri. No matter what anyone says, even if, Suzu have to oppose Nagumo-kun, Suzu swear that she will protect Eri!"



The gray bombardment was gradually losing momentum. Before long, it was decreasing until it became like a thin string and like that it melted into the air and vanished.



Suzu also erased her barrier. At her surrounding her monsters were standing by quietly. The corpse beast soldiers also stopped moving.



Her words reached her. Perhaps even her heart…Suzu thought that and her lips broadened slightly.



Ahead of Suzu's gaze, Eri quietly raised her face. What was reflected in those eyes was the color of passion and happiness――not, but coldness that was like ice filled with endless scorn.



And then, her words too.



"Are you an idiot?"



"――"



Suzu loosened cheeks instantly stiffened. Right after that, a huge gray magic circle manifested on the sky.



Eri's feather attack wasn't only intended to circle around Suzu's barrier and attacked her. Amidst the turmoil, Eri secretly slipped her feathers toward the sky. She bought time by going along with Suzu's talk and created a huge magic circle there with her grey feathers.



That magic circle was shining gray even while spurting out muddy black miasma. That shape was exactly the same like the crack of space that appeared above God Mountain.



The déjà vu that Suzu harbored was immediately proven to be correct. As expected, similar with the crack of space a lot of monsters appeared from there. What Eri created seemed to be a summoning magic circle.



"The nonsense is enough until this far isn't it? Just when I thought what are you going to talk about…Suzu really exposed your stupidity plainly here aren't youuu? Thank you for letting me buying so much timeee. Well theeen, can you die swallowed by these waves of monster?"



"…"



This time it was Suzu who was the silent one. From the sky, monsters that could fly or fought midair appeared continuously. The number of the surviving corpse beast soldiers was also still around seventy.



In contrast, Suzu's subordinate monsters, there were three missile bees, and one wind blade praying mantis, although they didn't die but they bore heavy wounds that made them unable to continue to fight. Although it was only a few but it was still a decrease in Suzu's fighting strength.



No matter how strong Inaba was, in front of the violence of number it would be only a problem of time before he was overwhelmed.



And then, far away the sound of fierce battle was still resounding, the possibility of Shizuku and Ryutaro coming for Suzu's reinforcement was remarkably low.



And so, Eri's expression warped in ecstasy. Indeed, Suzu's strength made her got cold sweat, but when the lid was opened, Suzu pointlessly wasted her time to persuade Eri and now she got the situation reversed, it was really an amusing joke. "Really what a stupid girl", Eri whispered one more time inside her mouth.



"I am your be-st-fri-end yes, even after a fashion? Then I'll at least listen to your last will you know?"



A great number of monsters covered the sky, amidst the darkness that fell on the battlefield like a dark cloud, Eri lifted up her sword and said such thing. Most likely, when that sword was swung down, an all-out attack would start.



In contrast, Suzu who realized that her word didn't reach Eri's heart and now she fell into an absolutely desperate situation said,



"Eri. You looked down on Suzu too much. ――Inaba-san! Please take care of the magic circle!"



"Kyukyuu!"



Taking out the iron fan that she settled on her waist before, as though to say that she had resolved for everything, Suzu stared back straight at Eri with eyes filled with determination without any unease or agitation there.



That excessively strong gaze made Eri took a step back unconsciously. When she noticed what she did she gritted her teeth. And then, feeling fed up with all the worthless talk, she swung down her sword that was equal with the scythe of the death god.



At that moment, the monsters in the sky and the corpse beast soldiers attacked all at once.



However, the corpse beast soldiers went toward the monsters.



"Wha-, what is-. Even though my command reached them properly-!"



Looking at the sudden friendly fire which began between the soldiers and monsters, Eri yelled angrily with confused tone mixed in. Eri's command was certainly reaching the soldiers without any obstruction. Despite so, they mistook their target and assaulted the monsters.



The one who brought the answer to the confused Eri was Suzu herself.



"Suzu's black crest butterfly――what do you think Suzu was letting them flying around for?"



"Do, don't tell me…"



"Finally noticed? You see, these children, they can scatter scales with various traits. Looks like the soldiers has been showered with enough. Right now, they should be looking at the monsters as Suzu and Suzu's monsters."



Eri felt like clicking her tongue. It seemed Suzu was thoroughly prepared.



Furthermore, at that time, a smashed sound resounded as though making doubly sure everything was screwed for Eri. Looking at the sky, a part of the summoning circle was blown away. At that spot, there was Inaba in a stance of kicking. He slipped through the gap between the monsters fully covering the sky in high speed and destroyed the magic circle.



The corpse soldiers who were originally the soldiers and knights of the kingdom, who were experts in anti-monster battle, with their specs increased like a joke they now killed the summoned monsters one after another.



There, naturally the subordinate monsters of Suzu, also the injured ones were healed by the corpse soldiers with healing ability because they looked like allies. After they returned to the battle line, the monsters in the sky were completely reduced to the hunted side.



Eri gritted her teeth while making the monsters to prioritize dealing with the black crest butterflies. The loyal monsters headed toward the butterflies fluttering in the battlefield and rushed them all at once.



At that moment,



*DOOOOON!! DOOOOON!! DOOOOON!!*



Flowers of explosion bloomed one after another at the sky of the ruined city. The moment the butterflies were touched, they instantly exploded.



The voice of Suzu resounded to the dumbfounded Eri.



"Did you think that Suzu can really subdue a total of a hundred butterfly monsters? Even though only three days has passed?"



"…Are you saying there are also fakes there?"



"Yep. More than half are Nagumo-kun's handmade butterfly golem. In exchange of scales they are carrying a large amount of combusting powder, see. Although it's only mini treasure warehouse, seems like gunpowder that cannot be compared with dynamite is packed full into it. How scary isn't it."



Eri narrowed her eyes. When she looked, she didn't notice before but there were black crest butterflies clinging on the head or the back of all the soldiers. Anybody would understand what the meaning of that was. While the soldiers exterminated the monsters and decreased their number, simultaneously it was also the countdown for the death of the soldiers.



"…This is checkmate? In this kind of place? Ahahah, how strangeeee. For Suzu to be the one who is destroying my plan. Even though you could just grovel like before without standing up again. Is this, also because of that monster I wondeeer."



"Suzu don't think she can say that Nagumo-kun has no relation in this. But, Suzu is here is unmistakably by Suzu's own will. Because Suzu thought that if Suzu leaves this alone then Eri will be killed by Nagumo-kun."



"What? Are you planning to say that you saved me I wonder?"



"Yep. Suzu come in order to save Eri. Because Suzu wants to restart with Eri one more time."



"…enough already."



Eri fell quiet once more. But, different from until now, it was only for a moment. Right after that, she invoked darkness magic 'Slip Mind' to Suzu while at the same time leaped at her. In a straight line, with her eyes carrying killing intent.



As though to say, would Suzu kill her or would she get killed by her, there was nothing else that could be done but to choose between those two choices. As though to cut away all of Suzu's words as complete nonsense. As though to declare that it was impossible for her to take Suzu's hand after this late.



"AaAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!! JUST DIEEEEEEEEEEEE-!!"



Toward Eri who performed suicide attack while yelling an abnormal shriek, Suzu bit her lip tightly. Her feeling wasn't conveyed to Eri. It couldn't be conveyed. Frustrating. Mortifying. Her reached out hand――didn't reach.



"Why, it has become like this…surely, Suzu mustn't say such words isn't it."



Suzu who looked like she was laughing and crying, bit her lip and blood trickled down, then she swept her fan.



At that moment, barriers were deployed enveloping the rushing Eri. Naturally, Eri used her disintegration ability and immediately cut apart the barrier but she was forced to stop for a moment. That was a fatal opening that was created forcefully by Suzu.



The moment Eri destroyed the barrier, the light petals that were controlled by the other iron fan rushed to Eri and wrapped her. Eri tried to sweep them away using her gray wings and bombardment and also her sword, but the light petals were like leaves fluttering by the wind, or possibly like river water that flowed unhurriedly, they swam in the air and evaded the attacks.



And then, right after that,



"Everything into the light, ――'Holy Severance - Falling Flower of Light'."



Light exploded.



All the light petals exploded in a chain reaction. A combination technique of 'Holy Severance - Sakura' and 'Holy Severance - Burst'. Surrounded by flower storm without any place to escape, impacts were fired inside without any spot spared from it.



With a timing that matched that, further thunderous sounds rang out consecutively in the battlefield. Along with those explosive sounds, several grand flowers of flame and impact bloomed proudly in the sky of the ruined city. The corpse beast soldiers that finished defeating the monsters were swallowed by the self-explosion of the dummy golems of black crest butterfly attached on their body and died.



Suzu was bathed in orange light by the several explosive flames. On her head, the fluffy Inaba fell. Inaba's fluffy front leg patted on Suzu's head *peshi peshi* as though to console her.



From inside the flame of light, *bobat* sound rang and a silhouette fell. White smoke was rising from Eri's whole body and she fell on the ground. Her four limbs were twisted to strange direction, her ash gray wings were already scattered. Magical shockwave also exploded simultaneously at that time so her magic power should be already blown away too.



Suzu quickly waved her iron fan.



"――'Light Halo'."



Then, halos of light linked into a net that materialized at the falling point of Eri. Eri was caught by that and she was dropped on the ground.



Suzu accompanied by Inaba landed down beside Eri.



"Kahah, gohoh………just, kill me."



It appeared she barely retained her consciousness. Eri didn't even move her empty eyes toward Suzu, she was staring far away and demanded for the killing blow.



"Eri…"



"Fri, end? Impos, sible…dying, is….better"



"…"



There was no disdain or contempt. Eri talked as though she wasn't looking at Suzu, to that, Suzu bit her lip tightly.



"Everything, is just, the worst. …I, only…"



"Eri? Only…what? Tell Suzu."



"…"



The words that stopped midway might be words that spilled out unconsciously even for Eri. Even with Suzu asking, she didn't show any sign of opening her mouth anymore. It was obvious that Eri's body was in a state where life was spilling out from her. Although her body was upgraded with the technique of apostle creation, the might of Suzu's trump card the 'Holy Severance - Falling Flower of Light' wasn't something half-assed. Without any treatment, she would only expire like this.



Suzu took out a container in the shape of test tube from her 'Treasure Warehouse II'. The content was healing medicine. It was something that had its effect dramatically increased by Hajime's metamorphosis magic, so it had ten times the effect of the highest grade healing medicine. It couldn't be like god water that immediately completely recovered the health, but it was able to keep alive someone even from a near death state.



But, Eri who saw Suzu taking that out and guessed what she was going to do, pierced Suzu with a severe gaze that was unthinkable coming from someone who was about to die. There was no word. But, those eyes talked more eloquently than anything. She would decline any pity from Suzu even if she was on the verge of death.



Suzu clutched the healing medicine tightly, wondering with clenched teeth if this was going to be their conclusion. This was something that she was half-resigned to. Even so, as expected her heart clenched tightly.



But, she couldn't be half-hearted. She couldn't reach Eri's heart. She couldn't reach her. She couldn't half-heartedly let her stay alive here. The path to let Eri live and brought her back wasn't by sheer strength, it had to be done by connecting their heart and pulling her hand. If Suzu acted half-heartedly here, the tragedy of that day would be repeated once more in the future.



That was the only thing that she absolutely mustn't do. A wish that blindly believed at convenient future and averted eyes from reality, what kind of future such thing would be connected with was something that Suzu understood really well to the depth of her bone.



Then, at the very least not by other's hand, this should be done by her hand.



That was Suzu's resolve.



Because although it was warped and imperfect but Eri was once her best friend. And then even now, she was able to wish to be best friend with her once more. That was why…



Suzu stored back the healing medicine. And then, in exchange her hand gripped the iron fan tightly.



Suzu and Eri's gazes crossed.



But, at that time, suddenly immense magic power burst up from a place that was separated from them by several ruined buildings between here. Before long the pure white magic power that stabbed the sky changed into a shape of human ten meters tall, the arm of that giant was swung down below.



The fierce impact was transmitted even until the place where Suzu and Eri were at.



"…Kouki, kun."



Eri opened her eyes and whispered.



Right after that, the light giant dispersed. It was as though it showed the fate of the caster…



"Kouki, kun…Kouki-kun!!"



"E, Eri-!?"



Eri's body that should have been in the death's door instantly shined gray.



And then, at the next moment her flickering wings and ragged body flew away with immense force toward the place where the light giant was seen.



Suzu who was unable to immediately move from being completely dumbfounded returned to her senses and chased after Eri in hurry.





Chapter 167




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. He also did the edits.



____________________________________________________



The Respective Conclusions



After Suzu pursued Eri and vanished at the other side of the ruined buildings, Shizuku and Ryutaro held a battle evenly against the attacking sixty corpse beast soldiers while also opposing Kouki.



If Ryutaro who metamorphosed his own flesh and invoked advanced metamorphosis magic 'Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation' to display a monster's special characteristic approached Kouki, then the soldiers would try to hinder him or possibly take him by surprise, but Shizuku would deal with them.



The swarm of black katana she received from Hajime――'Living Swords' rushed freely around the battlefield, they cooperated like a single living thing and grouped on the soldiers and cut them down.



"'Group Two - Flash Blossom'! 'Group Five - Flying Claw'!"



Shizuku's command echoed in the battlefield. Following that command, inside the swarm of twenty katana, four katana cut apart the large shields of the corpse beast soldiers who were possessing defensive type characteristic magic, even space was cut along with them. And then, the ranks of the soldiers became disordered. Four more black katana launched wind blades toward the soldiers who lost their steel shields.



The wind blades soaring invisibly with spectacular timing and mercilessly cut apart two large shield holders. The soldiers didn't get bisected because of their high defensive power, but both their arms were severed from the shoulder and rotated in the air.



"'Group Three - Draw Sky'! 'Group Four - Flash Blossom'!"



Furthermore, nimble soldiers were using the shield holder soldiers as stepping stone, jumping in the air to stab Ryutaro in the back, but they were pulled back forcefully by four black katana shining dark blue. The large sword and spear they held in their hand were attached tight *gakin* to the blade of the black katana flying in the air.



The large sword user and spear user who exposed fatal opening were immediately split vertically into two by the space rifts launched behind them. As expected, although they were corpse beast soldiers they would be rendered unable to fight without fail after getting bisected vertically like that.



Even the soldiers with healing type characteristic magic would need time to heal the loss of limbs or from getting bisected. And then, there was no way Shizuku would give them that kind of time so this was the same like removing them from the stage.



The soldiers attempted simultaneous attacks from up, down, left, and right to such Shizuku. Reddish black glints' of eyes stabbed Shizuku, the killing intents rode the wind and caressed her skin.



Yet, a soft mentality that would shrink back against something of that level had already been thrown away by Shizuku. Especially now that at her side she had the swarm of black katana given as protection to her from the man she was in love with.



"'First Group - Gravity Flash'! Cut apart, 'Soaring Claw - Four Ream'!!"



Four black katana pointed their tip outward at the four directions around Shizuku and then they orbited around her, the katana even rotated with twirls that looked elegant. The skill that was invoked was a skill that could temporarily cut gravity――'Gravity Flash'.



The result, the approaching soldiers were suddenly released from the chain of gravity and their balance was greatly broken. Not letting such decisive opening escaping, Shizuku's sword-draw slashed. With a speed to the degree where her sword arm looked blurred, four sword-draws were repeated within an instant. Each time bell-like sound *clink* rang, invisible slash made the head of the soldiers flew.



Furthermore, from behind them the black katana that were launched to the surrounding returned with fierce speed, cutting into pieces the headless soldiers without any difficulty.



Shizuku's 'Living Swords' were basically organized into five groups with four katana in each group. By chanting the group name and skill name, she could give the same order to one group. Also, every single one of the twenty katana had their own respective name like 'Slash One, Slash Two', Shizuku could also give an order to individual sword using those names. When Shizuku chanted the name of the technique, each of the Living Swords would attack the enemy with their own judgment using sword art based on Yaegashi-style that wasn't inferior to the skill of Shizuku herself.



Exactly as the name of 'Living Swords', all the black katana could have mutual understanding and image sharing with Shizuku using metamorphosis magic, so all the black katana could be controlled as the display of Shizuku's will without any time lag.



And, at that time, an angry yell reached Shizuku who was evading the fierce assault of the soldiers.



"Shizuku! Dodge!"



"――"



A warning from Ryutaro. Without confirming the content of that warning, Shizuku activated 'Air Force' and 'Ground Shrinker' and evacuated from that spot in one breath.



Right after that, the spot where Shizuku was at just a moment before was shot through by the flash of Heaven Might along with thunderous roar. One soldier who was swallowed in a bad luck was erased not even leaving any dust behind.



"Kouki. Bastaard, you purposefully overlapped the line of fire. Now you've really done it."



"I'm thoroughly familiar with Ryutaro's movement pattern after all. It's really easy to guide your movement."



"Shut up! If it's about that, then even me also know how you gonna move!"



Ryutaro rapidly approached Kouki with his ogre flesh. The scene of the huge body that easily passed two-meter scattering shockwave around while advancing had the intensity that could make anyone felt their stomach went cold.



"That's pointless."



However, on the other hand, Kouki's expression didn't even twitch. And then, without any chanting or gesture, the dragon on his back――the avatar of Heaven Might was controlled and shaped into a shield. Although, because the shield was made from Heaven Might itself, even though it was taking the shape of a shield it was still the light of destruction that contained the property of attack power of annihilation.



"Come on! 'Folded Vajra'!"



Ryutaro didn't falter. He crossed both his arms and applied the special trait of the ogre he metamorphosed into, the deployment of multiple 'Vajra'. It was a derivative technique that boasted toughness in the same level with concentrated reinforcement, this 'Vajra' was folded into double and triple layers and formed a protection of steel wall.



Ryutaro who was turned into a single steel mass charged into the shield of Heaven Might without stopping.



And then, even while his 'Folded Vajra' was blown away, he splendidly managed to breakthrough with only some wound.



"Yes. I thought that if it's Ryutaro he would surely do that."



The voice that resounded there was Kouki's calm voice.



The moment Ryutaro charged through the shield, with excellent timing a breath attack approached him. Ryutaro who had just released his 'Vajra' was approached by destructive light where it wouldn't end well for him if it hit even with his tough flesh of ogre.



But, even while being illuminated by the light of Heaven Might, Ryutaro showed a fearless smile. As though to say "I thought you are going to do that yeah?".



"Come, wolf king of the abyss, 'Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation'!"



Right after that, the breath of Heaven Might swallowed where Ryutaro was.



At the same time, Kouki turned his holy sword to the side and took a defensive stance, there *gakin* hard and powerful impact sound rang.



The tip of a claw was barely stopped in front of Kouki's eyes. The one who unleashed that claw was a bizarre shape with wolf head, furry upper body, and five sharp claws growing. It looked exactly like a werewolf in a fairy tale.



Kouki wordlessly brandished the light dragon to attack. But, when the light dragon's claw swept at where Ryutaro was, Ryutaro had already circled to the opposite side and his roundhouse kick attacked Kouki's shoulder. That abnormal speed blew away Kouki who could only gaze in wonderment.



And, the next moment Ryutaro caught up to the blown away Kouki, his wicked claw swung.



"Kuh"



The outrageous speed and offensive power made Kouki raised a groan reflexively. Even so, while repelling the claw with his sword, he commanded the light dragon and let flew countless light bullets. The Heaven Might's light that swept up like gatling gun became a counterattack that assaulted Ryutaro, but Ryutaro evaded all of that while leaving behind afterimages.



Metamorphosis magic 'Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation'――Mode Werewolf. Compared to the ogre shape the power and endurance of this from dropped, but the speed increased to an incomparable degree.



Ryutaro who slipped through the light bullets rushed into Kouki's bosom and lunged with a slash of sharp claws.



"Something like this-"



Instantly, Kouki broke the shape of the light dragon and exploded the light of the Heaven Might. Light swelled up all at once with Kouki as the center. Kouki who turned into a star made Ryutaro unable to endure and withdrew back.



But, his body was quite burned from what he couldn't evade. Ryutaro had immediately crossed both his arms and protected his vital spots, but this model wasn't suited for its endurance. His fur was greatly carbonized and smoked while he was made to take distance.



"Ryutaro! You okay!?"



"Ou, I only got hit a little bit there. Just this much is no biggie."



Shizuku who cut apart several soldiers and rushed toward Ryutaro poured down special healing liquid she received from Hajime on Ryutaro's head. This time Ryutaro's body smoked up for a different reason while Ryutaro's wolfish gaze glared at Kouki.



"Rather than that, as expected that Heaven Might is troublesome. It changes shape too much. I cannot attack him when it matters."



"Then, let's try it with the two of us this time. Thanks to Ryutaro holding back Kouki, I have finished taking care the majority of the soldiers."



"Okay. Suzu is also going all out after all. No way we can say that we cannot win even with two people here."



"Right. We are going to beat up that idiot quickly!"



"Ou-!"



Confirming that Kouki changed the shape of Heaven Might into a light dragon once more and fired breath attack to them, Shizuku and Ryutaro dispersed in one breath.



Looking at that, Kouki shook his head once and then burst out with even more magic power, his expression was an expression of determination.



"I'm getting worried for Eri. I got surprised in various things by the two of you, however, you two has used up your trump card right? I'll end this right now."



Kouki simultaneously invoked the mini light dragons, the Heaven Might version of Sky Flying Sword, and the Heaven Might version of Heaven Meteor Rain in the attempt to overrun the two altogether with the battlefield.



The current Kouki was just like a fortress that randomly shot laser cannons. The light of Heaven Might that was formed into various shapes around Kouki thoroughly destroyed the ruined buildings in the area while approaching Ryutaro and Shizuku to envelop them.



But, putting it another way it also could be said that it was a rough attack that lack refinement. For that reason, Ryutaro laughed. Because he had guessed that Kouki who got impatient after witnessing their persistence would surely rely on large technique.



Right now it was the time to show their trump card that was prepared for against Kouki.



"Come, great tree that pierces the sky-, 'Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation'-!"



Amidst the many approaching Heaven Might, the fur of the werewolf fell out, and that body transformed. Everywhere throughout the body turned gnarled, the skin was dyed into blackish brown color, the hair also changed into deep green color. In all that changes, only the eyes were releasing glaring light of reddish black color.



Right after that, Ryutaro was attacked by small light dragons and the meteor shower of Heaven Might. Ryutaro didn't even dodge, he charged toward Kouki while being swallowed into the light.



"Ryutaro, sleep for a while for me."



Kouki was convinced that Ryutaro was defeated and murmured that. Putting aside the ogre shape that was specialized for defense, there was no way for Ryutaro right now who didn't seem to use 'Vajra' to be able to endure that.



But, that thinking was immediately proved to be wrong.



"Don't screw with me. No way I'm going to sleep before beating you until you wake up."



"Wha-!?"



Ryutaro leaped out unhurt from inside the light.



And then, Kouki who was completely taken by surprise and shown opening was punched by the fist of the rapidly approaching Ryutaro. The straight punch that lunged straight stabbed toward Kouki's stomach across the armor. The aim that accurately struck to the solar plexus produced a grand impact that was transmitted toward the inside of Kouki's body without anything spared, whipping up his internal organ.



"Gohah!?"



Kouki knew well about the destructive power of Ryutaro's fist, but still, even with his holy armor and impact mitigation skill, the terrific power that might blow away his consciousness made his mind fell into chaos for a moment. His throat was blocked by the blood he vomited from the unbearable pain.



Metamorphosis magic 'Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation'――Model Trent. It was a plant type monster that lived at floor ninety of the abyss. Its special trait was to absorb light and converted the light energy that it absorbed. The converted energy could be changed into anything, whether magic power, stamina, or pure muscle power.



Yes, Ryutaro with this trent shape absorbed the light of Heaven Might that was a light element magic, he then converted that into physical strength.



Because the impact didn't disperse and was concentrated at one point when it was let out, Kouki didn't get blown away, his body was lifted up and laid down on the fist. To this Ryutaro laughed fiercely at Kouki.



"Yoo, are you waking up a little with this, best friend."



"Guh, Ryuta――"



"This one is a freebie. Just how long you are going to sleep talking huh!"



"――Gua!?"



The face of Kouki who couldn't move immediately from the impact was punched by Ryutaro's fist that was like a rock. *Goba-!* Incomprehensible sound rang out from the attack to the face, Kouki scattered around nosebleed while getting blown away.



Even so, his body that was reinforced by Ehito was barely able to keep the connection of his consciousness. He somehow controlled the light dragon that was connected with him and tried to fix his posture.



In a moment, a goosebump suddenly went through Kouki's spine. At the same time, his 'Presence Detection' notified him of the existence of the swordsman lying in wait in the direction where he was blown away.



Naturally, the one who endured the storm of Heaven Might and corpse beast soldiers and circled around was Shizuku. She was standing still in her stance of sword-drawing, while compressing her magic power to an amazing density. Her sheath was creaking loudly as though unable to endure the power, dark blue magic power was overflowing out from the mouth of the sheath.



Kouki desperately attempted to put a brake on himself while calling Shizuku's name with a voice that sounded similar with a groan from the burden in his body.



"Shi, zuku-"



"Be obedient and accept it, this one attack."



Like that, while her figure vanished with 'No Beat' Shizuku stepped forward while faintly whispering "――'Soul Demolition'". The flash of sword-draw that was unleashed along with that whisper drew a splendid straight line on the air and bisected Kouki.



"――"



The definite sensation of a slash passing through inside his body made Kouki screamed wordlessly while feeling that he was unmistakably cut.



But, he finally escaped from the impact Ryutaro inflicted on him while seeing Shizuku who passed through him and stayed unmoving in slashing posture, and then he managed to stop moving. Kouki's eyes reflexively widened, and then, feeling dumbfounded his hand crawled on his body.



Under his hands there wasn't any sign of cut for even a bit, his body was certainly still connected in one piece safely.



"Just, what in the world…-, what, my magic power is-"



For a moment, Kouki was thinking something convenient that the feeling of getting cut was only his imagination and as expected Shizuku was unable to cut him, but right after that, he was made to know that Shizuku's slash had definitely reached him.



The light dragon that Kouki had on his back was split into two with the upper part slipping off diagonally, but it dispersed all at once right after. Not only that, even the meteor swarm of Heaven Might - Heaven Meteor Rain that he launched, also the flying slashes of Heaven Might - Sky Flying Sword, and also the small light dragons that flew around like all-range weapon, they were all dispersed.



In that situation, a feeling of lethargy attacked him like it was only natural. Kouki's body staggered and fell on the ground. Even his flight using the light dragon, also the 'Air Force' from his boot became unable to be maintained.



Even so in order to avoid falling to his death Kouki landed on his knees. Shizuku and Ryutaro landed down in front of him.



"Shi, zuku, what, did you do…"



Kouki asked with trembling voice.



"'Soul Demolition'――the base of this skill is the ability of soul magic that could interfere with the immaterial of the living thing. This skill will search for the source of power in the target. The target's magic power, stamina, mental, those things that eye couldn't see could even be cut with this. Cutting only what you want to cut…the farthest territory that a swordsman should reach, I cheated and progressed until there." (TN: There is the implication that she was asking Hajime's help in accomplishing this.)



Kouki's eyes opened wide at Shizuku's explanation. His expression was dumbfounded as though to say "What the hell with that".



It was only normal for him to be like that. After all Shizuku didn't affect Kouki's body and only cut apart the magic power overflowing inside the body. Indeed, it could be said that cutting only what one wanted to cut regardless of any obstacle was the swordsman's farthest territory.



Shizuku was being humble saying that she was cheating as a swordsman thanks to the help of the black katana, but in actuality just by invoking 'Soul Demolition' wouldn't so easily let the user choose the target to cut.



After all, it was an act of penetrating every factor of the human body and cut only the target. It would take a really clear image supplementation and above all a tenacious will to accomplish that. A clear will without any hesitation, of cutting only what one wanted to cut while absolutely not wounding anything outside it at all.



It sounded easy to do just by listening to the explanation, but it was actually not as simple as it sounds, it was something impossible if the swordsman wasn't someone at Shizuku's level. At the very least even Kouki who learned the same Yeagashi-style wouldn't be able to use 'Soul Demolition' perfectly.



"…But, that was a bit of a blunder. I thought that I'm going to sever the curse of 'Bind Soul' with the attack just now, but I couldn't reach it because it was protected by magic power. …You are still watching a convenient dream right now aren't you?"



While the swarm of katana was following on her back, with a *cling* sound Shizuku prepared the black katana in her hand once more, seeing that Kouki's expression distorted.



"Shizu, ku. You couldn't, cut me, because…you are still, thinking of me, in your heart….that feeling, still remained, right? Nagumo's, brainwashing, isn't perfect. …I cannot, feel your killing intent, is the proof of that."



"Kouki…"



"It's, fine. Ryutaro also, didn't, try to kill me. I will save the two of you――"



Kouki's words were halted. Because Shizuku unleashed the 'Soul Demolition' with the drawing out of her black katana. Ryutaro who was crossing his arms on the side while wrinkling up his eyebrows patted Shizuku's shoulder as though to say 'thanks for the hard work'.



Shizuku also sighed 'fuuh' while sheathing her katana back. That was because she was convinced that Eri's 'Bind Soul' was cut. With this, the mind that was filled all over with inconsistencies planted by Eri should be crumbling.



"Kouki. How do you feel? With this the brainwashing should be released already. What have you been doing until now. What are happening right now…you understand aren't you?"



"…"



"Well, no matter. Anyway, just reflect on yourself there. Later we gotta chase after Nagumo and others quickly, punch that shitty god, and then help the guys fighting on the surface……we are going back yeah, Kouki."



"…"



Shizuku and Ryutaro called at Kouki, but there wasn't any reply from Kouki. He kept being down on the ground on all fours without even lifting his face. His expression was hidden by his hair and completely unseen.



Although, even though he was not replying it seemed that he wasn't in silence. The ears of Ryutaro and Shizuku caught the faint sound. A small voice that didn't even form words. Kouki was hanging his head down while whispering inaudibly.



"Kouki?"



"――――Lies, impossible. This is strange. Absolutely, wrong. Because I am correct. I was just being brainwashed. For me to be the enemy…to Shizuku…to Ryutaro…what had I done…even though it shouldn't be like this…even though I just want to act righteously…I just want to be a hero…just like Jii-chan…that's, all…why something like this is…everything is stolen…because Shizuku and Kaori too were stolen by that guy…Ryutaro is also that guy's ally…"



"O, oi. Kouki!"



"That's right…this is a trap. A foul scheme…that guy plotted this…I just got caught in it…I'm not in the wrong. I'm not wrong. This is because that guy stole everything important to me. The wrong one is that guy. If only that guy isn't here then everything will go well. Yet, Kaori and Shizuku and Ryutaro and Suzu too, everyone, to that guy…this is a betrayal. I was betrayed. I was-, betrayed! By all of you!"



Kouki ignored Shizuku and Ryutaro's calling and kept whispering before he suddenly lifted his face in the blink of eye with a dangerous look, glaring at the two with a gaze filled with hatred.



No, perhaps that expression, should be called as grief instead. The feeling of guilt and remorse, the uneasiness of being unable to return anymore, fretfulness, despair, and so on, the saturation of the negative emotions was attacking himself, even he himself already didn't understand just what should he do, it was that kind of expression. Kouki was in a state of panic.



His appearance, was just like a lost child.



But, the strength that he possessed wasn't that of a child by any means. A scream that was filled with plenty of Kouki's hatred and grief resounded, at the same time his magic power that should have dried up surged out with an unbelievable force. The magic power thunderously twisted in a spiral and pierced the sky.



That radiance, was as if…



"-, Kouki! Stop it! Your magic power should have dried up already! Doing more than this will affect your life!"



"Damn it! What the hell! Why his magic power is overflowing like this! Wasn't it gone already-"



"It should have been gone! It was severed together with the line that supplied magic power to Kouki. Even now he isn't absorbing the magic factor at the area to recover!"



"Then just why-!"



"Something likes that-, because it is gone then he can only take it from another thing! Perhaps, his life force or his soul, he is pulling out magic power forcefully from those kinds of things right now! Sooner or later this won't end well for him!"



"Fucking shit! Koukii! Come back to your sensees!"



Yes, as if it was the radiance of Kouki's life.



Shizuku had certainly used 'Soul Demolition' to sever the magic power and the supply line that provided him with infinite magic power inside Kouki. There was no doubt about that. And then, even with 'High-Speed Magic Recovery' that recovered oneself by absorbing magic factor from outside, it was impossible to recover this radically. Actually, even looking at the flow of magic power that Kouki spouted out, they couldn't catch sight of any magic from the surrounding flowing into Kouki at all.



That there was the magic power that shouldn't be there, meant that Kouki was paying some kind of compensation to forcefully bring it from somewhere, such thinking was a valid one. And then, this method that normally was impossible couldn't be expected to be safe or anything. If Kouki was left alone as it was, undoubtedly there would be compensation that Kouki couldn't shut his eyes from.



In front of the storm of magic power that released outrageous light and pressure, Shizuku and Ryutaro braced themselves, they held their arms in front of their face while calling at Kouki. But, Kouki kept being in a frenzied state, his ear didn't listen. With hatred and grief in his expression, it was as though he was trying to destroy the reality before his eyes, no, it was as though he was trying to destroy himself, the radiance of his light was strengthening.



"…Anything and everything are over. I wonder, why has it become like this. Kaori is there, Shizuku is there, Ryutaro is there, Eri and Suzu are also there, together with everyone, we are overcoming the difficulty…that's how it should be, and yet"



Kouki's monolog with an expression of crying smile, was resounding extremely clearly.



"Something like this is not what I wished for. If everything, is lost then…if not a single one cannot be taken back then…then I'd rather everything is gone, with this hand!"



The ground and building in the area that were hit by the torrent of magic power became dust and got annihilated. Right now, the radiance of magic power became the radiance of Heaven Might. At the same time, that raging light was gradually focusing and forming shape.



"…Oi, Shizuku. I'll take care of the Heaven Might. I'll leave Kouki to you."



"Are you sane? That Heaven Might is far more dangerous than before you know? You won't be able to absorb it even in trent model. …You are going to die there."



The words that Ryutaro murmured while enduring the tyranny of light with a grim expression, made Shizuku frowned even more. But, in contrast Ryutaro was making a fearless smile on his lips.



"Heh, I'm not gonna die here. No way I'm gonna get killed by that guy's hand. I cannot die here no matter what, that's why I'm absolutely not gonna die!"



"You muscle brain. There is no logic or anything in what you said just now. …But, fine then. Right now is not the time where logic is needed. Beat up that sulky desperate idiot until he is crying and apologizing okay!"



"Ou-!"



Ryutaro leaped forward. With a fierce smile, he clenched his fist hardly like a rock filled with the resolve of bringing back his best friend without fail.



Right after that, along with a scream, a torrent of light――the bombardment of Heaven Might spiraled out from the thrust forward holy sword and violently assaulted the two.



But, Ryutaro didn't falter. Rather "BRING IT OOON!" he raised a war cry and met the attack from the front. He crossed both his arms and stepped forward while fully displaying the trait of the large tree monster.



Along with a tremendous impact sound, the bombardment of Heaven Might directly hit Ryutaro. But, Ryutaro wasn't annihilated. He wasn't blown away. Like a rock that blocked a raging stream and changed the water flow, like a towering large tree that didn't even twitch against a furious storm, he kept blocking the light of devastation right from the front and advanced a step, and then one more step forward.



Looking at that unshakeable figure, Kouki's eyes opened wide. He was convinced that the Heaven Might that he unleashed right now had the greatest power compared to everything until now. Yet despite so, Ryutaro blocked it from the front. As though to say, that he wouldn't run away from Kouki, as though to say that he wouldn't avert his eyes.



The reddish black glint of eyes of his transformed best friend that pierced him straight from between the torrent of light, made Kouki's leg backed off unconsciously. Those eyes were telling him "I'm absolutely, going right there. I'm not gonna let you run away no matter what!" more eloquently than anything.



Like that, Kouki who was half dazed from that intense will of his best friend came back to his senses with a 'hah'. When he noticed, he had been approached until there wasn't that much distance remaining between them.



"Do, don't come! Don't come here! If you, come closer than that, I'm going to kill you for real! Even if it's Ryutaro, I'm really going to kill you!"



Kouki yelled with an expression that was going to break in tears anytime in derangement. Seeing the figure of Ryutaro who had approached near him until the distance where he could even see his face, Kouki's heart became even more disturbed.



Yes, Ryutaro was already wounded all over his body. No matter how great the trait of light-absorbing the trent model had, there was this thing called limit, in actuality, the light of destruction that couldn't be dealt by the trent's trait was making both his arms torn all over, everywhere in his body had blood spurting out.



But, nonetheless Ryutaro was still smiling fearlessly. And then, he advanced, one more step.



"A, a, aaAAAAAAAAAH!"



Kouki screamed. Even himself already didn't understand just what he was doing. He was merely repeating 'it shouldn't be like this' in his heart while wielding his strength to deny the reality before his eyes.



The mass of Heaven Might that was completely formed was a giant that could even come out in legend. The giant of light held its large arm aloft, and clenched its fist. And then, light exploded with Kouki's scream as the nourishment, like that the fist swung downward toward Ryutaro below like a star.



*DOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO-!!!*



A thunderous sound resounded. The ground was bursting open with the place where Ryutaro was at as the center, everything was swept away in a radial shape.



"A, aa…"



Kouki moaned. While being in a daze he was convinced in the corner of his mind. Right now, he had killed his best friend with his own hand. Kouki's heart was creaking. His eyes lost focus, meaningless thought was running around in his head.



Like that, Kouki's mind was almost breaking down, at that time,



"Yoo, best friend. What, a shitty pathetic face, you are making there."



"Eh?"



The dust was blown away.



There Ryutaro was standing. He was alive. Not only that, while grinning fiercely, he was stopping the crushing blow of the giant with both his arms lifted up. His body that was like a gnarled blackish brown tree had cracks running everywhere on it, blood was spurting out from all over his tattered body, yet the strength residing in those eyes wasn't weakening even for a bit.



"Ryu, Ryutaro? Su, such thing, why, this should be impossible to bloc…"



"Stupid…idiot. A fist, like this…without any spirit in it…is not gonna work on me. …Hey, Kouki. You…just cannot kill me. Do you…understand why huh?"



"U, e?"



"See. That's because, the current me…is invincible. Since the time I decided-, that I'm gonna bring back my stupid idiot best friend-…I am invincible-. That's why-, you…won't be able to kill me-. Until I bring you back-…I'm absolutely…not gonna get killed or anything—"



"u, a…wh, why are you, going that far…"



The heroic words and figure of his best friend caused Kouki's voice to be caught up in his throat.



Facing such Kouki, Ryutaro smiled broadly with wounds all over his body and formed his words.



"Something like that, is obvious, right? If your friend went the wrong path…punching, and stopping him…is a best friend's…role ain't it."



"Because, a best, friend…"



"Ou. …But, well, for this time, that role, I'll leave it to her. It's pathetic but, my fist…doesn't look like…it will reach."



"Eh?"



Hearing Ryutaro's words, Kouki was taken aback for a moment. Ahead of his gaze, under the giant's crushing blow that Ryutaro blocked, a black shadow was rushing through. With her trademark ponytail fluttering, and a dignified gaze that was looking straight at him, it was the girl who was his childhood friend.



"――'Soul Demolition'!"



"――!?"



The invisible slash cut apart the magic power inside Kouki once more.



The giant of Heaven Might split into two and the upper part slipped off diagonally while dispersing. Underneath it, Ryutaro collapsed with all his strength used up. Before Kouki's eyes were a figure standing still in a stance of drawn blade staring at him with a gaze that looked likes obsidian stone. While all of those were reflected in his sight, Kouki was falling backward from the slash's impact.



And then, Kouki who saw how the intent to attack didn't disappear from Shizuku's gaze even after she swung her black katana, "Aa, so this is my retribution…" with a strangely calm feeling he prepared to accept the blade of his childhood friend.



But, there a voice resounded. A familiar dignified voice.



"Grit your teeth-! You big idiot-!"



"-!? Guah!?"



*Dogo-!* With a dull loud sound, a severe impact was transmitted on Kouki's cheek. The force that echoed until the core of his head blown away his consciousness for a moment. His sight that immediately returned after that was also flickering black and white. Strength naturally left his arms and legs from a cerebral concussion.



The sky was visible in his distorted sight. Kouki was vaguely understanding that he had fallen down.



Right after that, the following impact came from his opposite cheek. His head was snapped with a force that might tear off his neck. Just when he thought that, the next moment his head was snapped to the other side again along with an impact. And then further impact, impact, impact…Kouki's head was blurring left and right in high speed like a broken toys.



"This one is for all the trouble you caused for me! This one is for all the troublesome things you pushed on me! This one is for wasting the follow-up I did for you! This one is for not seriously listening to my scolding! This one is for various other things but anyway this if for me! This one is also for this and for that and for there and also for me!"



"Buh! Beh! Boh! Bah! Goh! Hih! Gih! Gee! Oboh! Abeshih! Buberah!?"



'ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA-!!' With a force that made anyone looking at this scene would feel like hearing that, Shizuku was earnestly talking about her share of retribution while doing not a double slap but already double punch on Kouki's face. The white object glittering in the air was surely Kouki's tooth.



"Shi, Shizu-, wa-――"



"I won't wait I won't stop punching until you are crying and apologizing! My store of patience already has run out completely here, no more playing around! How long you are going to throw tantrum! Because everything is not going how you want it you get sulky and want to break everything! You pushed that tantrum to your surrounding! This shitty brat-. I'm not going to listen to whatever you say anymore! I'll teach this idiot that cannot be talked with using a beating! Prepare yourself!"



Shizuku's angry yell echoed in the war site of the ruined city. She was straddling Kouki who was lying down facing up and mercilessly punching repeatedly with her left and right fists.



"Shi, Shizu-, gahah"



"It shouldn't be like this? That's obvious! There is nobody who is living with everything going their way! Everyone, they gritted their teeth, held their head, they will say 'even so-' and then they did their best still! Running away from the reality in front your eyes, without even trying to fight, there is no way you can obtain the future you wished for like that! You, in the end, you are just a spoiled brat-. You averted your eyes from anything inconvenient, you are only wracking your head for excuses, and if that's still not enough then you will think that's because of other people's fault…"



Before he knew it, the fists of Shizuku lost their momentum, in exchange they grasped up the collar of Kouki strongly.



"Anything and everything is over you said? Don't screw with me-. If you think you can just end it all by yourself then that's a big mistake. You think I'm going to let you die easily like that-. If you are not going to understand no matter how many times I said it, then I'll make you understand forcibly. Even if I have to tie your neck with a rope, I'll drag you back. After that, every time you do stupid thing I'll beat you up!"



"Shizu, ku…"



'If you still feel like making impertinent talk then I'm going to hit you until you cannot talk', the eyes that were glinting right before he were telling him that. Blood was already leaking from Kouki's mouth and nose, his face bloated up looking like a goblin, Kouki who was turned into such a horrible state opened his mouth with a voice that sounded like a groan.



"Di, didn't you, choose Nagumo…"



"That's right. The one who I like is Hajime. It's not you. So what?"



"…Why…aren't you giving up…on someone like me…even though I did horrible things…why…"



Even though she should have chosen Hajime, even though he had troubled a lot of people, even though he had done horrible thing to his important best friend and childhood friend, yet why didn't they abandon him, to Kouki who stared at her unable to hide that bafflement, expression of rage finally vanished from Shizuku's face and a troubled smile appeared.



"Isn't that obvious. Because you are my childhood friend. We have been together all this time since childhood, for me you are the same as an important family, that's why. Family, absolutely will not forsake family. Well, though I want to be spared from having a bothersome little brother like this."



She couldn't abandon him because he was like an important family. No matter what stupidity he perpetrated, he wasn't abandoned, that was why they were family. Like that, inside Kouki who was told that along with a smile, something fell with a thump.



For the sake of the world, for the sake of the people whose face he didn't know, because he was a hero, because he had to be righteous, all the things that he was fixated with until now suddenly looked small.



Only, because they were family, because they were best friend, they said that and they acquired strength incomparable from before, they came pursuing him until a dangerous place like this Holy Precincts despite him being the betrayer, even though they might die they just laughed and stopped him from running wild.



…Even though those should be an insignificant reason, just why they felt so big to him. Why, did they felt so powerful.



Tears were falling from Kouki's eyes in large drops. His pathetic self that he finally became aware of from the bottom of his heart, and the childhood friends who still reached out their hand staking their life until the end even for someone the worst like that, caused an emotion that was indescribable and soppy, yet by no means it felt unpleasant welling up inside himself.



"So, rry. …Really, I'm sorry…I, something like this…aa, I, what have I…"



"You are crying while apologizing huh. This big idiot."



After an indescribable feeling toward his childhood friends, a tremendous feeling of guilt and remorse welled up next. For Kouki who was fixated with the right thing until now, what he had done was the lowest and the worst deed. To the degree that he thought that he should repent for that with death.



But, that thinking was something that would make the act of his childhood friends who staked their life into something worthless, and then, in the end that thought was,



"Don't you run, Kouki. Live, fight. We won't forgive any path other than that."



Death was just an escape. Even if it was hard, even if he lost his place to belong, even if he was cursed and disparaged by anyone, he had to keep living. That was exactly his atonement, a fight that Kouki had to do. In place of all his wretched escape until now, he had to continue to live and fight from now on.



Kouki cried while biting his lip at the straight gaze of his childhood friend. As though the feeling of his childhood friends was carved in his soul. As though he was determined to part with the him before this.



"…Shizu, ku. I…must not die. I'll live, this time for sure, I have to fight. Not against anybody else, but against myself."



"Yes, that's right. That's why, cry now, after that stand-up and do your best. If you are mistaken, then I'll beat you up until you cry once more."



Listening to what Shizuku said, Kouki showed a complicated expression that seemed vexed and pathetic, but also a bit happy where he couldn't say anything. And then, he directed red eyes at Shizuku who let go of his collar and moved aside from above him. Those eyes had clear color as though evil spirit had left him.



"…There is, no need for that. Because, I'll change. I swear I'll change. To the degree that a childhood friend the same age as me cannot treat me like a 'little brother'."



"Is that so? Well, even if you become like that, I won't treat you as a man you know?"



"Uu-, don't put up defensive perimeter like that. …Is that how much you like Nagumo?"



"Yes, I love him. I am deeply in love with him. It's vexing that I cannot monopolize him, but I'll even share him peacefully. About the hardships of that side, if it's him then he will easily shoulder it."



"Don't speak fondly of another man in front of your beaten up little brother like that…"



Kouki smiled wryly. There were plenty of frustration filled in that gaze, but he didn't look disturbed from jealousy. Because in his heart he had an understanding. Just what attracted Shizuku to Hajime. That something was exactly the difference between him and Hajime, possibly even the difference between him with Shizuku and Ryutaro, it was the reason for his defeat, he finally understood that.



"…You two, are you two forgetting me?"



While Kouki was feeling frustration and self-reproach of his childishness until now and resolved to change for his atonement, Ryutaro had crawled and approached their spot before letting out a voice of displeasure.



"My, Ryutaro. You really can move even with that tattered state aren't you?"



"Because I already drank Nagumo's Yunke– special recovery drink just now. I barely can move." (TN: Yunkeru Royal C, a drink in Japan.)



Kouki directed his gaze at Ryutaro who was answering while waving around a test tube container. He looked straight at his best friend who was wounded all over because of his fault, at the man who continued to call him 'best friend' through and through.



"Ryutaro…I'm sorry."



He mustn't lower his head. If he lowered his head, he would take off his gaze from Ryutaro. Because he had decided, that he wouldn't avert his eyes from any truth, any reality, for the second time.



Ryutaro who received that gaze of Kouki returned a calm gaze after a little pause. And then a beat later, he smiled broadly and only said a word,



"Ou."



As though to say that excessive word was unneeded, he replied with just that. The answer that was just like Ryutaro made Kouki smiled a bit. Between the two of them, just that word was enough.



But, at that time, a voice suddenly resounded.



"What, is this…"



Shizuku came back to her senses with a 'hah' and quickly turned aside with the black katana in hand. Ryutaro also tried to ready himself somehow, but his damage was too deep, on top of that his 'Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation' was also already released, so he couldn't stand up.



And then, Kouki who was in the same state that couldn't stand up called the name of that voice's owner.



"Eri…"



With wounds all over her body, Eri was floating in the air with her flickering gray wings flapping. She was staring at Kouki and others in a daze.



Suzu also came in pursuit from behind. Shizuku averted her gaze from Eri for an instant and met Suzu's eyes. They were happy for each other that they were all safe, and then, the next moment they stared at Eri with an expression that was pregnant with tension.



Eri didn't even notice Suzu, she was letting out a cracked voice.



"Heey, why, is the atmosphere is warm like this? Heey, Kouki-kun. These guys are the enemy you know? They followed the hateful, hateful enemy that stole every single one of Kouki-kun's important things, they are betrayers you know? Why are you talking with them peacefully I wonder? Why I wonder? Heey, why?"



While tilting her head bobbingly like a broken toy, Eri talked with an empty gaze and unfocused eyes. Her four limbs were smashed and twisted into the wrong direction, so she looked like a marionette that was created with bad craftsmanship.



"Eri…I'm sorry. I already, cannot fight against Shizuku, or Ryutaro, or Suzu. All this time I have been mistaking the enemy that I should fight."



"…What's with that?"



Eri's head tilted to the side and stayed still unmoving. The angle of her head made them hallucinated that the bone of her neck had broke. Eri gazed at empty air and opened her mouth with madness riding her voice.



"What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that? What's with that?"



"E, Eri, listen to me-. I, I am a stupid idiot that don't understand anything, but right now there is one thing that I do understand, that surely I hurt Eri. That's why, perhaps you think that it's too late right now but-, just one more time, let's talk-"



Eri repeated the same words like a broken record. Kouki who reflexively called at her one more time made Eri's eyes that stared at empty air to catch sight of Kouki in a snap. And then, she stared at him for a while with an expressionless face like a noh mask.



The air was strained tightly whether one wanted it or not. Kouki didn't avert his eyes. His words were clumsy, inside his heart he didn't understand anything at all, he didn't understand about what he should do and everything didn't go well even for himself, but even so he thought that he had to look at Eri properly.



But, that straight gaze looking at her desperately seemed to have the opposite effect that made something inside Eri couldn't accept it.



Strength suddenly left Eri's body. And then, she made a sweet smile that looked the most human from everything until now. That was a mysterious smiling face, where resignation and scorn, cynicism and exasperation were mixed…



Like that, a single word, her last word resounded in this world.



"Liar."



"Eh?"



Kouki tried to ask back.



But, before he could let out any word, intense light surged out from Eri's chest.



"Tha, that's-, Eri, you-――"



Shizuku who saw through what was the source of the light raised her voice in shock.



That thing which emitted intense light from Eri's chest. Once, when Kouki and others were cornered in Orcus Great Labyrinth, in order to save them Melt Logins tried to use that magic tool for self-explosion――'The Last Loyalty'.



But, the light that Eri emitted was incomparable with that time. It was obviously letting out strengthened power. It was obvious that it was hiding a power of artifact class. Most likely it was 'The Last Loyalty' that she stole from among the leader class knights that she turned into corpse beast soldier, then she reinforced it with some kind of method into artifact class.



Its destructive power was unfathomable. And then, the activation speed was also incomparable with the original 'Last Loyalty'.



Shizuku's words were cut off. Because an explosion that erased even the sound trampled the area along with the light.



The torrent of light dyed everything white. A silence that made anyone hallucinated whether the world had vanished was violating everyone.



Shizuku, Kouki, Ryutaro, they all immediately covered their face with their hands. And then, by lifting their hands like that, they noticed that they were able to recognize that the world was dyed with white and silence. At the same time, they saw a shadow that stretched long toward them.



That was the shadow of the protector they could rely on. The barrier master who had protected her comrades many times over until now. The girl was standing in the way of the torrent of light without taking even a step back, two iron fans readied like a shield. There was also the shadow of Inaba clinging to that back as though supporting her.



No voice could reach. But, Shizuku, Kouki, and also Ryutaro prayed wholeheartedly. Because they could do nothing else except that, they prayed that at least their pray would reach, becoming her strength.



Suzu felt like nodding a little.



Before long, even her figure was buried in light and became not visible.



Suzu was in a mysterious space.



Right after she nodded feeling as though she was hearing the voice of Shizuku and others, when she noticed she was already in this white space. There was no light or impact in this really deep space.



In such mysterious place, there was only one person other than Suzu.



"Eri…"



"…Suzu."



The two of them faced each other with a certain distance between them. They stared at each other for a while wordlessly. The one who opened her mouth first was Eri.



"What a strange place. Is this a revolving lantern one see before death…a bit different I guess. Or a near death experience…I died already though so I guess that's really not it."



"Then, Suzu has died too perhaps. Suzu thought Suzu managed to defend to the end however."



"Who knows? If possible I want to take you all along with me though."



"Suzu want to live. Suzu also wants Shizuku, and Kouki-kun too, also Ryutaro-kun to live too…Suzu also wants Eri to live."



Suzu's words made Eri snorted as if she making fun of her.



"Hmph. After sending me flying mercilessly like that, you can still say that so shamelessly."



"Ahaha. Yeah."



Eri became plainly displeased looking at Suzu who was smiling wryly. And then, without even hiding that displeasure she further opened her mouth.



"I somehow feel that we won't be in this world for long, that's why I'll say this right now. Suzu is seriously gross."



"…Hee. For example?"



"Let's see. Like when you always laughed foolishly. Or even when you were talked behind your back, you still laughed as expected. Or how your inside is a perverted old man. How you said disgusting thing like wanting to become a friend even when in the middle of killing each other. It won't end if I keep showing other examples, but the grossest thing is, how even when you are already in this age, you are still calling yourself with your own name. No, really, you are impossible aren't youu"



Suzu's forehead was twitching with her vein visibly rising to the surface. And then, still smiling she counterattacked.



"Suzu seeee. But, Eri is also mostly disgusting aren't you?"



"Haa?"



"You always had a friendly smile while standing behind. Even when you were talked behind your back you only smiled as expected. Your inside is just someone dour. You wear glasses and act reserved like a library committee member, you tried too hard fitting in with that cliché. Also, Suzu doesn't want you saying anything about how Suzu called herself. Just what with your 'boku'. Seeing a glasses girl getting too worked up calling herself 'boku' like a library committee member is just painful. Furthermore, [I am the heroine] you said. Pupu-, you need to graduate from being a chuuni." (TN: Chuunibyou=Sickness of the youth where they kept mass producing black history. They were convinced that they were a character of fantasy story.)



Eri's forehead was twitching with her vein visibly rising to the surface. And then, still smiling she counterattacked.



"Chuuni? I don't want to be called that by a painful girl who said something like [Onee-samaa] in real world seeee. Geez Suzu, you have an inclination for yuri aren't you. I have felt the danger to my body several times before. What an impossible pervert. Really gross."



"Ahaha, something like that is still in the range of joking, right? I don't want to be treated as a pervert by a misunderstanding female who got hung on her first love and rushed full speed to the hill seee. Seeing that is really impossibly painful you know. Really gross."



"…"



"…"



" "AAaa?" "



Both of them were slinging violence of words at each other with a thuggish expression that didn't look like high school girl beauty. After that for a little while abusive language that would make anyone wanted to cover their eyes flew back and forth between the two.



Like that, perhaps unable to continue to breath the two of them were going "Haa haa" with their shoulders heaving, around that time the white space suddenly began to crack.



"Hmph, looks like this world is finally ending."



"…"



Suzu couldn't reply to Eri who was making a refreshed expression. With her hands on her knees she was facing down while hiding her face. But, she couldn't hide the things that trickled down on the ground.



"…What, you are crying? Stupid."



"Sh, shut up, already. The one who said, idiot, is the idiotic one…"



Suzu held back her sobbing while roughly wiping the overflowing drops. Guessing that the true parting was approaching, she was unable to hold down the something that was welling up in her heart.



"…I said something like that just now but, perhaps, Suzu and others haven't died yet. The one who is going is me(boku)…just me(watashi)." (TN: Eri suddenly changed the way she called herself there.)



"E, ri?"



The way she called herself that suddenly changed, no, returned to normal made Suzu lifted her still crying face. Ahead of her gaze, Eri who was still averting her face was making an expression that was deliberately displeased.



"Suzu also understand somehow right? Despite so why are you crying like that."



"That, is"



"…Really what an idiot. Just what are you feeling regretful for, for this kind of betrayer, this worst woman trash."



The white world was noticeably dispersing from the edge.



"At this late you were saying 'want to be together' or 'protect', I thought whether you were actually aiming for that."



"Eri, Suzu is…"



"Come on, that's disgusting so change the way you call yourself."



"Uu, Eri…"



A collapse separated the two. Almost everything had been mostly dispersed other than the foothold of the two. Amidst that, Eri's words that sounded like a monolog resounded.



"…At that time, if the one that I met on that bridge was Suzu…what would happen I wonder? For me to think of sooomething like that, yep, I'm the biggest idiot."



"Eri, Suzu is――I, am glad to be Eri's best friend! Even if that was faked, even if it was distorted, it was fun! I-"



The foothold dispersed. The body of the two was also turning into sand and vanished as though blown away by the wind.



Eri who was facing aside turned her face toward the yelling Suzu. Her expression looked expressionless, but somewhere it also seemed to be filled with a relieved atmosphere.



And then, the true last words of the girl named Nakamura Eri reached only the girl named Taniguchi Suzu who was once her best friend, who by some chance, might even still her best friend even now.



"…Bye bye. The time when I was with Suzu, I felt at ease, just for a little."



"――"



Suzu's yell was swallowed by the vanishing world and didn't become sound.



Even so, from the expression that Eri showed Suzu in the last moment, she believed, that surely she had reached her.



*drip, drip* Such feeling caressed her cheeks.



Other than what was behind Suzu, everything was turned into dust in this ruined city. There a sobbing reverberated.



The twin iron fans that Suzu held with both her hands crumbled in pieces as though to say they had finished their role and fell on the ground. Suzu herself also sat down on the ground with a body full of wounds, but Shizuku and others who were completely protected behind her didn't call at her worriedly.



Shizuku and others didn't know about the mysterious phenomenon that Suzu experienced. Even so, they were able to guess that the tears that Suzu let out were her feeling for her important friend. That was how pained and how sacred her figure looked.



Before long, as though to say that she had cried enough, Suzu wiped her eyes briskly, and then with those bright red and clear eyes, she clenched her body and stood up. And then, she turned toward Shizuku and others with an energetic turn.



"Now, Shizuku, Kouki-kun, Ryutaro-kun. Let's advance ahead!"



An innocent smile. Just like how it usually was. That smile which protected her comrades in a different meaning than a barrier, right now it looked a bit like an adult. Compared to when they were in Japan, compared to when she cheered up everyone in the labyrinth, it looked far more charming.



The source of liveliness that was overwhelmingly effective made Shizuku and others to naturally slacken down their cheeks. Though it was only Kouki who was making a complicated expression.



Has something happened, he didn't ask that. Because surely that was something that was stored inside Suzu's heart inside even her treasure box. To forcefully ask her would be a boorish act.



"Yossha! Let's chase after those guys and help them with this and that!"



"Even if you said that, I and Ryutaro cannot move properly though…"



"Besides, the clock tower was also destroyed you know? It doesn't look like there is other entrance that can connect the spaces."



Shizuku turned her gaze at the place where the clock tower was at. Over there, she couldn't find the ripple that connected the space.



"Aa, now that you mentioned it, the ruined city of this space is not only in this place, I heard that story before."



"Then, let's search for another city! The skyboards are quite ragged, but I think if we use every trick in the book then they can still be used for a while. We surely can find another city if it's from the sky!"



"I guess there is that. Anyway, Kouki and Ryutaro, you two have to recover quickly. I'll make you two drink restorative medicines until your stomachs are bloating like a balloon."



Kouki and Ryutaro looked at the recovery drinks lined up before their eyes with reluctant eyes, even so they poured them down their throat somehow and their body was healed with the combination of their own recovery strength.



Like that after resting for a while, they took out their skyboards and flew to the sky. Kouki was riding together with Ryutaro on his skyboard.



Suzu who soared high to the sky in the lead twirled to turn behind and looked down on the ruined city below with a bit lonely expression. However, that too was only for an instant. She immediately made a strong and lively smile and raised her voice.



"Now, everyone, continue after me!"



"Geez, Suzu."



"Haha-, this is the Suzu that we know."



"We are no match for Suzu huh."



Like that Suzu, Shizuku, Ryutaro, and Kouki, the four of them in order to chase after Hajime and others they searched for other ruined city and soared in the sky of another world.





Chapter 168




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. He also did the edits.



____________________________________________________



The World of Holy Precincts



"Just how many spaces there are here."



"Hmmm. It's fortunate that they enemies art not a big deal but…Goshujin-sama. How much further will it be until we reach Yue?"



When Shia who stayed still in a posture where she had just blown away an attacking monster to the beyond with Vire Doryukken murmured that, Tio who also similarly just blew away a monster to the beyond even with her magic power restrained using compressed and spiral movement to increase her breath attack's power turned to Hajime while asking that.



"Comparing it to the starting point at the first space…we have gone through around four-fifths of the distance. I guess it might be the next space or the space after that."



"So you say that it will be soon then!"



When Hajime answered that while activating the compass, a monster came attacking in that timing from behind. With a fierce step Shia stepped between the monster and Hajime and while sending the monster flying with a full swing, she made a happy expression. For the moment if a comparison was made, then the monster here was at the same level with the middle level of Orcus Great Labyrinth's abyss, but for Shia, they were not enough at all as an opponent. Hajime was also in a state where he wasn't bothered at all.



At the night before storming this place, Shia and also Tio continued to train inside the space where the time was stretched using Hour Crystal until the sky turned bright, so their strength had been raised from obtaining new power like utilizing the metamorphosis magic and so on. Although it also felt like a hasty preparation, they were in possession of enough cards that could become a trump card.



Although, that too was also thanks to Hajime's cheatmate, the outrageous food that was overflowing with fishiness, this item had quite a strong influence but…they could only pray that their stomach wouldn't get hurt. In here there was no toilet, so it would become something dreadful for the female camp if such thing came to pass.



Currently, Hajime and others were smack dab in a middle of the ocean. As far as the eye could see there was not a single island, it was a space of sea. Sometimes, sea monster leaped out from the sea and bird monster flew from the sky, but they were dealt with without any particular problem.



Although, it was a place without any landmark or anything, so if they didn't have the compass, just how much they would need to wander here…just imagining of being in that situation where they didn't have any time to waste made them shuddered.



Just as could be understood from Shia's words, Hajime and others had passed through several words until this point. After they parted from Shizuku and others and passed through the clock tower of the ruined city, they had traveled through a space where the ground and sky were reversed, a space where countless white blocks were floating, a space where there were only large mountains like God Mountain towering over, and a space that was like a giant library where countless bookshelves were cluttered together.



They were able to discover the exits to the next space at all those spaces without getting lost thanks to the compass, so not much time had passed since they parted with Shizuku and others. Even so, when they thought about Yue, they got impatient no matter what, so there was nothing more aggravating than all these countless spaces for Hajime and others.



They did nothing but advanced straight ahead for a few minutes in this space of large ocean with really good visibility that showed them nothing but water, to the degree they wanted to doubt whether there really was an exit in this place. Thanks to their skyboard, Hajime and others covered a considerable distance in a short time, but they suddenly lifted their face.



"Dark cloud?"



Hajime whispered so while narrowing his eyes. His words weren't really a figurative expression that pointed at the end of this journey. In actuality, the sky that was supposed to be clear was beginning to be covered by dark cloud rapidly like seeing a video that was fast forwarded. Furthermore, even the calm sea was beginning to be stormy due to the strong wind. It appeared that a large storm was suddenly generating.



The obviously strange situation made Hajime quietly narrowed his eyes, his gaze was turning below.



"…Looks like there is something big there."



"Uwaa, this is also…this is the largest size we have seen from all the monsters we have encountered until now isn't it desuu."



"Yes, I can feel a strength that is in a different league with all the monsters we hath encountered until now."



The expression of Shia and Tio who followed Hajime in looking below distorted unpleasantly.



Ahead of their gaze, a giant whirlpool began to form on the sea. It was obviously not something natural. The phenomenon wasn't created by sea current. It was a whirlpool created by the side effect of a living thing's movement.



Before they realized undulation was coiling to the degree that covered the whole sea below――there was a giant snake there.



Looking from the shadow projected on the water surface of the stormy sea, they could see that the whole length of it might be more than three hundred meters. The diameter of its body was so thick that it couldn't be so easily measured by sight. The whole body was covered by metallic scales, on its back there were also fins attached that possessed hard shine, they glinted just like a blade.



And, at that time,



KISHAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!



A terrific roar thundered, space was rattling. That roar which was accompanied by physical impact struck Hajime and others violently, in addition, an unknown wave was transmitted to their mind. Probably this roar was accompanied with an effect that awakened terror in the listener's mind.



Normally the one who heard this roar would have their body along with their mind blown away into darkness due to the shockwave, and even if they barely maintained their consciousness, their brain would be in disarray and their body cowering in fear, they would be turned into prey and could only tremble while waiting to be eaten.



However, amidst all the people that were here, not even a single one of them was someone cute like that.



"So noisy. Anyway eat this."



Hajime took out Agni-Orkan with a gloomy expression and began an all out shooting. Furthermore, he casually took out from his 'Treasure Warehouse II' metallic spheres the size of a basketball――huge explosive and dropped them all into the sea.



A beat later. For an instant light flashed below the sea surface, then along with muted explosive sound countless water pillars burst up toward the sky.



GUOOOOOOOOOOOH!!



The monster of sea raised a shriek. It wasn't a scream. It was a roar of pure fury. It was enraged from the impertinence of the puny being's attitude.



As though to display that fury, reddish black light surged from inside the water. That light which made anyone felt severe killing intent was a glint of eyes. While the roar of fury was still shaking the air, the sea surface swelled up like a mountain, and that figure appeared.



A head that looked like dragon leaped out from the sea surface with a long neck that was longer than fifty meters. As for the size, if one was told that each one of its scales was as large as a human child then its hugeness surely could be felt. There, there was a pair of eyes emitting reddish black light and the two layers of sharp fangs that lined up smoothly, and also something like fin at both sides. The fins were similar like the torso, they possessed metallic shine and sharpness of blade, it felt like just by touching it would cause the one touching to be bisected right into two.



An absurd pressure. Just by existing there, the sky was enveloped with a dark cloud, the sea was raging as though the end of the world was coming. The large snake, no, the sea dragon was coated in countless scales that looked harder than even steel, its appearance was just like the leviathan that was told in the legend of earth.



"If we hath to classify this then this must be a 'Divine Beast' doth it not."



"Certainly, from here I can feel a pressure above that of the 'Evil Eater' we fought in Meljine Undersea Ruins. If this one is above even an ancient monster, then that's a valid expression desu."



Shia agreed with Tio's opinion about this monster. But, even after calling the monster a 'Divine Beast', their expression was comparatively composed. There was also no color of tension that could really be heard from their voice. By the point of time they could converse calmly about the naming of the divine beast, it had shown how the pressure of this divine beast leviathan wasn't something that worried them.



Perhaps such composure was transmitted to the divine beast, because the divine beast then roared once more. As though to say that it was impossible for his might to not affect these puny existences, the roar was even more powerful than the first one.



But, that roar made it a little too defenseless.



"I told you, you're noisy."



Hajime took out his improvised Shuragen.



No, what Hajime took out, whether in the aspect of form or spec, both aspects were already far excelling the territory of an 'anti-material rifle'. The barrel that stretched straight for four meters long had extensive caliber more than the previous version, no matter how one looked at it this size should be called as gun turret instead. In total the whole weapon had become more than two sizes larger.



――Electromagnetic Acceleration Large Caliber Sniping Cannon(Rail Cannon) Shuragen AA(Acht Acht)



Are you looking for a lovely weapon of man's romance? Very well, then it's the 88mm! This rail cannon was something that resided in Hajime's soul.



Hajime who fixed his aim by holding it under his arm made it so crimson spark was running through the rail cannon. Right after that, the large muzzle turned at the divine beast and the trigger was pulled without any hesitation. With acceleration incomparable with anything until now, the charged cannon that was specialized for piercing let out a fierce thunderous sound and blast while bullet flew out, the bullet had a trail of red flash behind and flew into the divine beast's mouth.



And then, *DOPAN!* such sound came out while the scale on the back of the divine beast's head was smashed and sent flying from inside, in addition, the bullet didn't stop, it also blew away the cloudy sky above and vanished at the beyond of this another world.



GAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH!!



The roar that was raised once more was obviously a scream. The beast's head was thrown back from the impact and its mouth stayed opened with blood scattering everywhere.



While snorting at that, Hajime made something ran in the shadow. Its speed was too fast and because of the dark cloud the surrounding became dim and it was hard to see, the divine beast also just received damage and got agitated, so it missed that shadow and allowed the thing to infiltrated inside its mouth.



In order to vomit that out, and then also to vent its violent rage toward the one who granted it damage, the divine beast spewed out a terrific heat from its jaw.



Hajime kept silent and took out crossbit. Right after that, the four point barrier that the crossbit created was hit by the blaze, its surface was licked all over by the white hot flame. But, as long as it wasn't the disintegration attack from an apostle, the barrier wouldn't be broken that easily, the face of Hajime inside the barrier was unruffled.



The divine beast gazed in wonderment for a moment seeing its flame got stopped, although as though to show its pride as a divine beast it increased the force of the heat further, attempting to roast Hajime to death. Perhaps it should be said as expected from a divine beast, the heat of the blaze was absurd, the flame was something that one mustn't touch at all cost and the sea surface began to evaporate and smoked up. There was also the effect of the blaze, but the dark cloud that was once blown away was rapidly beginning to come back.



But, right after that,



"Even though we have to hurry on ahead, read the mood already desuu!!"



A mass of faint blue pierced through the sea of black cloud and fell down like a meteor. Rabbit ears were flapping violently from the wind and got unruly. It was Shia.



Right after Hajime defended against the flame, Shia stored her skyboard into 'Treasure Warehouse II' and leaped in one go to the sky, she broke through even the dark cloud, danced in the clear blue sky, and turned around after that. Using 'Air Force' to continuously stepped on the air, she fell like a meteor aiming at the target.



A wall of air appeared with Shia as the center. Shia instantly shook free from that and plunged into the world of the speed of sound, her momentum didn't decrease even for a bit and Vire Doryukken which had its weight increased until twenty tons using gravity stone were readied in overhead stance.



And then, the head of the divine beast that got absorbed in spewing out blaze from its large mouth was struck with a gruesome attack without even a drop of mercy or reservation.



A thunderous roar. The sound of pulverization. And then a shriek.



The divine beast whose mouth was forcefully closed had blaze spurting out in trickles from the gap of its mouth while its muffled shriek was also leaking out similarly from the gaps. The head that was covered by those metallic scales was pulverized like broken glass, reddish black meat became visible from there.



Shia's attack was considerably effective. The divine beast showed a staggering motion that didn't fit its status. Perhaps it even got a concussion.
